
Worm/Persona 3 crossover 
Summary: Taylor triggers in much worse conditions than in the original, but the outcome is furiously powerful. She gets a contract from the Velvet Room and obtains access to Sea of Souls, but the damage had been dealt, people killed, words said. The world is changing...





Velocity and Assault slowly made their way through the empty hospital corridors, though strictly speaking, it was impossible to call this place a  ‘hospital’. It was a clinic, nothing more. However, it was like a miracle. How could something like this exist in the conditions of such a city as Brockton Bay, where Panacea was actively practicing? Still, it existed.

The place was… dead, and it was the best definition of the state of silent horror that the heroes were experiencing right now. Patients, some medical staff of the hospice, all these people were dead. There were no horror masks on their faces, no broken bodies that could specify a violent end. There was nothing at all. They seemed to have died instantly, as if they had just fallen to the ground and never gotten up. It was terrifying.

Miss Militia and the Armsmaster were in the opposite wing of the building now. That allowed them to cover a bigger radius and to narrow the search for the causes of... this. The Remaining heroes stood in a cordon now, making sure no one could enter… or more importantly, exit. Three minutes from here there also were forces of the New Wave in full strength on a case of unforeseen circumstances. Whatever happened here, the Protectorate could not allow it to get out of this building, otherwise the number of victims could become countless. 

Suddenly, the attention of the heroes was drawn by a strange sound. It was a dreadful mix of a scratch, shout, growl and ten more sounds which they could not recognize in all conscience. But this sound was illogically wrong. Unnatural. Unhuman. Undead.Looking at his partner, Velocity realized that he was not the only one who heard this. Having exchanged glances, the two heroes rushed towards the source of the sound.
  It was small hospital ward in section for hopeless patients. It was a Hospice, after all, but here lay people with most complicated cases, people whose life was completely depended on the life support system. As they approached, the sound grew louder and became more and more unnatural. It would seem that sound was not reflecting from walls, on the contrary - it pierced through them. Velocity felt that his head slowly started to ache. He sighed to himself, being absolutely sure that after this he would be inevitably placed under the Master/Stranger protocol. And he’d be damned if that voice… sound, whatever hell it is has something in slightest similar to that voice of Simurg. 
 At last they reached the door of the ward.
Velocity looked back on Assault.He nodded at the door and prepared for battle. He quietly and slowly opened a door and looked inside. In his superspeed-mode, of course. A moment later he freezed out on a place, falling out of the accelerated status.
 He managed to see a lot of disgusting and terrifying things during his career as a cape. Several years of fight against various threats, from supervillains to Endbringers - the monsters who were capable to destroy whole nations. He remembered what happened in Ellisburg after Nilbog’s madness. But even this life experience was not enough to remain quiet and indifferent in case of a picture he saw.
 It was a small chamber. Even smaller than the rooms in which they had looked in before. Almost all the free space of the chamber was occupied by numerous medical equipment for life support. Apparatus for respiratory support, artificial dialysis, intravenous nutrition from droppers. Dozens of wires and tubes separated from the snow-white apparatus and converged in the center. But the centerpiece of the room was ... Something.
 It... it had a humanoid form, dressed in some sort of army overcoat of some grayish fabric with a red border and metal buttons. On the hands of this creature were immaculately white gloves. In combination with the same immaculate white jackboots and a huge broadsword attached to the belt with a huge golden badge, he would create the image of some military officer... if not for the triangular bone mask with huge teeth and eight coffins that soared under the ceiling, creating a kind of halo .
 The creature paid no attention to Velocity. All attention of the creature’s eye pits was focused on the hospital bed standing in the middle of the ward. Creature's hands, clad in white gloves, smoothly shook the bed back and forth, as if it was shaking a cradle with a baby. The bed creaked plaintively, opposed to the unnaturalness of these movements, but the entity clearly possessed superhuman strength.
 It took a certain amount of effort to allay the trembling and find the strength to transfer the view to the hospital bed. Covered by a thin blanket, a young girl was lying on it.... 
…at least it should have been a young girl.
 But with all of his tact, Velocity ​​could not say that the girl looked good or healthy in any degree.
 Pale face with huge bruise under her only visible eye. Another one was covered with a huge white patch bandage and Velocity seriously doubted that it was done without reason. Many terrible, ugly scars on the entire surface of the hands, as if someone had torn the pieces of meat from her body. Concealed chest, general dystrophy. Velocity ​​did not know what exactly happened here, but looking at the monster that rocked the girl who was at least unconscious, he definitely had some thoughts about what could have caused this.
 Velocity swallowed nervously. It was quite obvious that the cause of everything that happened here was precisely this... being, apparently some kind of Projection. And if his assumptions were correct, then without the participation of the girl, this projection couldn’t be removed.
 Having coped with the emotions, Velocity ​​left the room, carefully closing the door behind him and turned to Assault looking at him. Their exchange of views lasted for a few seconds, after which both simultaneously reached for the radio.
 - Assault - PRT, we found the probable cause of the incident. One of the patients. Little girl, probably trigger, right now she is in coma or something like that, there is a projection hanging above her in a meter, which publishes inhuman sounds. Requesting assistance from Panacea.
 - Understood, Assault. Stay where you are and wait for the Armsmaster and Miss Militia to arrive. You need to make sure that the projection is safe before New Wave allows Panacea to begin treatment.
 - Acknowledged, Assault out.

 Three hours ago.
Her world was like a pile of broken glass. The once solid canvas of her mind was now crushed as if it was broken into tens and thousands of shards, each of those had its sharp and obtuse angles. And putting those pieces together was practically impossible.
 Consciousness returned to her with excruciating pain. The pain was everywhere. Splitting her head, crumbling her legs, burning her skin. Every cell in her body ached and groaned in agony.
 Who is she? How did she get here? What happened? - all these questions surfaced in her pain-filled mind. Her memory now was like a sky puzzle for a thousand details, which a curious three-year-old child scattered around a huge azure-painted room.
 Thinking was painful. Thoughts flowed with the speed of a viscous jelly and did not want to clarify.
 Taylor.
 She remembered. Her name was Taylor Hebert. Was she... fifteen? She had... parents. Yes, she had parents.
 But then…
Then…
Someone died. But who?
Head pierced with pain. More than before. 
Annette!
The one who died was named Annette?
Then her mother died? Right?
The question addressed to her own memory remained unanswered.
 She tried to open her eyes. Muscles... muscles did not obey her, as if rusting mechanisms from long non-use. Her eyelids seemed to be made of the heaviest lead she had ever seen.
 But she kept trying. She continued and her attempts were rewarded with success. Light that she seemed not to have seen for an eternity hit her eyes. One eye to be precise. It was not clear why her second eye saw only darkness.
 Eyes immediately watered, trying to adapt to an abrupt change and her gaze began to blur. Taylor felt that the other feelings begin to return to her.
 First came the hearing. The measured buzz of unknown devices was accompanied by a non-stop squeak of other machines whose purpose she probably knew, but for some reason could not remember.
 The next sense was smelling, immediately catching some strange and slightly harsh smells that surrounded her. And again she could not remember where she was and what this place looked like. As if the associative chain broke off, not reaching the end. The puzzle detail did not want to fall into place.
 All she could see was only a gray ceiling, with some lighters which looked damped for some reason. Body refused to obey her and she could not move at all. Her tongue felt like it has rooted to the top and refused to move.
 Meanwhile, her awakening clearly did not go unnoticed. In any case, her newly-established hearing caught the sound of an opening door and someone's quick steps that approached it. After a few seconds, she felt the upper half of her body begin to rise, as if some kind of mechanism lifted the bed.
 Her eye focused on the man who stood before her. He was a man about forty, with a small beard and brown eyes with thin glasses. A white dressing gown was thrown over his shoulders.
 The man caught her eye and interpreted it correctly.
- Miss Hebert? If you understand me blink twice.
 Taylor fulfilled the request of the man, still not quite aware of what was happening. The man nodded in satisfaction.
- Well. First of all, you are safe. Our department was created specifically for such patients as... - the man continued to say something, but Taylor no longer listened to him.
 Did he say “patients”?
So she is in the hospital? How did she get here?
 Where is father?
What happened?
 Taylor tried to find her latest significant event in her memory. 
Was it January 9th? Typical day. Friday. Lesson with Mr. Gladley. She saw Emma, ​​Sophia and Madison again...
 Emma?
 Sofia?
 Madison?
If earlier her head just hurt, now it seemed as if someone had driven a thousand red-hot nails into her brain all at once and let electric current pass through them in a couple of tens of thousands of volts. 
 Δολοφόνοι *
What was that? Strange words. Strange language. Unfamiliar, unknown. 
Whence? No, what's going on? Why did she think about the Trio, how she...
 Οι εκτελεστές αθώων
Again. This voice. Where is it from? Why does it seems so familiar? Why can't she remember what happened? Where is her father?
 The doctor seemed to understand that something was wrong, as his voice had become sharply restless.
- Miss Hebert, what happened? Please calm down, nothing threatens you!
 Nothing threatens?
And something threatened her?
Yes? Not?
 Why can't she remember?
 Πέθανε
This voice. Is it answering her? She had a feeling that it is telling something important, but she can not understand. She went crazy? But then why doesn't she even understand the voice in her head? Questions. Too many questions in her head and too few answers. 
Why can't she remember?
  Ψυχή σου φώναξε
It really answers to her. Unfamiliar voice. Such... inhuman. Such... Extraterrestrial. But... she knows him. Definitely knows. But from where?
  She must remember. Must.
The pain began to intensify again, which apparently affected the apparatus.
- Miss Hebert, calm down! Sister, sedative in the 314th, quickly! - the doctor almost shouted into a small walkie-talkie attached to a bathrobe.
  Η Θάλασσα των Ψυχών σα άκουσε
Madison. Sofia. Emma. Winslow.
Madison. Sofia. Emma. Winslow.
Madison. Sofia. Emma. Winslow.
Four words. Associative series. Emptiness. Open chain of memories.
   Taylor again stopped seeing anything, the darkness covered her eyes, and the headache increased more and more with each heartbeat.
 Madison. Sofia. Emma. Winslow. #! ♫ eK√╓ → /.
 Madison. Sofia. Emma. Winslow. #! ♫ eK√╓ → /.
   Υπογράψατε τη [σύμβαση]
Winslow. It all comes down to school. She knew that.
  What happened?
Something happened to her. Something bad enough for her to be here.
   Trio.
It must have been them. They did something.
Have done with her.
Madison. Sofia. Emma. Winslow. T! ♫ eK√╓ → /.
Madison. Sofia. Emma. Winslow. Tr ♫ eK√╓ → /.
Madison. Sofia. Emma. Winslow. TrieK√╓ → /.
Madison. Sofia. Emma. Winslow. Trig K√╓ → /.
Trigger
  A revolver drum clicked in her head, replacing an empty nest with a loaded one.
  Ανακαλύψατε [Προορισμός]
Madison. Sofia. Emma. Winslow. Trigger
The puzzle fell into place, the integrity was restored, the picture was assembled from fragments. A headache that tormented her mind in an instant receded, leaving her mind in the crystal clarity of thin crystal.
   She opened her one eye to look into the eyes of the doctor who was now leaning over her. But catching her gaze, he seemed to recoil, turning a little pale.
  Father. She did not see him. The doctor did not say anything about him. She didn't like it.
Was it a premonition?
No. Knowledge.
   Something went wrong.
  She tried to say, but her tongue seemed stuck to the palate, and the tubes in her throat prevented her from speaking.
   But she said. She didn't know how, but she said.
What about my father?
  From the side, her voice seemed to be a dead man's whisper, devoid of emotions and full of some inhuman lifelessness.
“Miss Hebert, your father, he ...” and then the doctor made a fatal mistake that launched a chain of very unpleasant events for many people.
  Dr. Stevenson hesitated.
  Είτε το όνομά μας
- What happened to father? - she repeated her question, not really thinking about how she could speak. It didn't matter. Secondary.
  Danny was more important.
- Listen, Miss Hebert. I don't want to lie to you, but you need to calm down. Now the nurse will come and give you an injection ...
- I must know.
“Miss Hebert ...”
- Tell me!
The doctor sighed.
- Fine. Your father, he ... passed away. Almost three weeks ago.
Tηλεφωνήστε μας
- How did it happen?
- Heart attack. I am very sor.... - Dr. Johnson did not have time to finish his words. The last words in his life. Because at this very moment, Taylor Hebert screamed
[Ανα άτομο]


***
Six hours later. Protectorate Tower. Briefing room.

Emily Piggott tiredly rubbed her nose. Today could hardly be worse.
- So, what do we have at the moment? - she looked in the direction of one of the officers, who was holding a tablet. He got up and clicked on several sensors, leading out information onto the big screen.
- The identity of parahuman discovered by Assault and Velocity ​​is established. - A picture of a young girl with black curly hair and simple black glasses appeared on the screen, - Taylor Hebert, fifteen years old. High School Student Winslow.
- “The one that the Shadow Stalker goes to,” Piggot affirmed the obvious fact. The officer nodded, confirming what the director said. Then he continued:
- Parents: Annette Rose Hebert and Daniel Hebert. Both deceased. Annette died in August 2008 in a car accident, Daniel - two weeks ago, from a heart attack.
“Hebert ... somehow I know that name ...” Jessica Yamada muttered to herself. After thinking for a while she snapped her fingers - was it not him who was the spokesman for the Dockers Union?
“Yes, he was,” the Armsmaster's voice replied through the communication systems. All the heroes of the Protectorate were now connected to the intercom in the hall, and several screens on the far wall broadcasted image from the cameras on their suits. - met him several times while discussing the problem of cleansing the Brockton Bay.
- Enough. - the director stopped unnecessary conversations, returning everyone to the main subject, - what happened to her? Is that really trigger-like situation?
 Officer nodded, continuing the report.
“We have no reliable data on what exactly happened, but with the help of an analysis from Dr. Yamada — the officer showed a psychologist who nodded her thanks — could establish that with a high degree of probability Miss Hebert was systematically subjected to bullying for a very long period of time.
“Miss Yamada, on what basis did you draw your conclusions?” - Piggot switched to a full-time psychologist. Mean hurried to answer.
- I came across a similar events earlier. Her schoolmarks, which were so consistently high, suddenly began to leap, especially for homework for which she received F’s, due to lacking of that homework, moreover, the work performed in the class and not requiring interaction with other students she performed at the same consistently high level. This is not enough, but it is most likely outcome.
 Piggot rubbed her nose again. There always were problems from these teenagers, Wards and their antics were enough for her, and now this Hebert ...
- Thank you, Yamada. So, we suppose, that they bullied her. But what brought her to a coma? She tried to make a conflict with her offenders?
“We don't know that, ma'am.” Four weeks ago, Miss Hebert asked for leave from the second lesson and never returned to class. Six hours later, when classes ended, janitor found Miss Hebert in the back room where the inventory was kept. She was half-dressed and there were obvious signs of sexual violence on her body. Also Miss Hebert was under a pile of biological waste. Judging by the data of criminal examination - various used tampons, garbage and so on. At the time of discovering, the girl’s pulse was traced as filamentous. Paramedics were able to stabilize Miss Hebert’s condition and deliver her to the Brockton Central. There has already been an examination. According to the results, it turned out that Miss Hebert recorded multiple genital ruptures, severe brain concussions, irreparable damage to the left eyeball, three fractured ribs, as well as multiple infectious diseases as a result of which she fell into a coma from which she did not leave until today.
“Why didn't she get an appointment with Panacea and what the hell were she doing in the hospice?” - Miss Militia voice was heard from the intercom.
  The officer nodded.
- Actually an interesting question. As I understood, after the incident, Denny Hebert raised all his connections and cleared out all bank accounts in full to pay for his daughter’s treatment and simultaneously sued Winslow. But it did not work. We managed to find out a little, but apparently they were actively trying to hush up the case. But who - we do not know. The school’s lawyer was Mr Alan Barnes.
- Isn’t that Barnes who achieved a probationary period for Shadow Stalker six months ago? - clarified Piggot. In her mindscape this whole situation right now turned to a very foul-smelling one.
- Yes. It’s him. He works in a law firm that is headed by Brandish - the officer nodded and waited for the Director’s resolution, continued, - Mr. Hebert did not find enough money for a lawyer, because the lion’s share was spent on the maintenance of his daughter, and therefore he had to defend his honor himself. But since the case was clearly not in favor of Winslow, he won, and Winslow undertook to pay for the treatment of Miss Hebert. And everything would be fine if Mr. Hebert did not file a lawsuit a second time, against Mr. Barnes, accusing him of allowing his daughter to mock Miss Hebert.
“Can’t say that was the the smartest step ...” commented one of the Protectorate workers present, but remained unrecognized.
- Forced to agree. This case Mr. Hebert lost, and then received a counterclaim for defamation, which Mr. Barnes immediately won, suing himself a good compensation. As you already understood, the financial condition of Heberts at that moment was far from ideal ...
“And as a result of all this, a heart attack happened ...” Piggot finished gloomily.
- Yes ma'am. Since Mr. Hebert did not leave a will, and Heberts didn’t have any living relatives, a leapfrog began with juvenile responsibility and guardianship, aggravated by paperwork, during which Miss Hebert showed no signs of recovery, so somebody decided for her to be transferred to Saint Brute's Hospice to maintain life support. Where she stayed until today ...
- .. Where she woken up. Without a family, with memories of a trigger, about the circumstances of which I don’t even want to think, and without any particular hope of recovery, do I understand everything correctly? - having waited for a nod, Piggot continued, - gentlemen, I understand this whole situation. But in all this I am interested in two things. Why do I find out about past month events only today? Events which took place in one of Wards schools? And how the hell is Alan Barnes is connected to all of this?
“Actually ...” the officer said.
- Yes? Simmons, do you have anything to say? -  Piggot turned back to the speaker.
“Ma'am ... our men visited the Hebert house. And they found something …”
- Do not torment me, officer.
 Simmons nodded and took from his briefcase a sealed evidence package, inside which lay a thick common notebook. He carefully handed the package to the Director.
“This was in the case of Hebert vs. Barnes as evidence of bullying.”
  She opened the package and removed the notebook to the light. Opening the notebook at an random location, the Director read the notes.
   After ten seconds of reading, she froze. Then she reread the same fragment again.
All this time, her face turned paler and paler, acquiring a painfully white shade.
   Finally, with trembling hands, she put the notebook on the table and looked around at those present.
  - Immediately put all Wards under the M/S protocol. Isolate them at least for a few hours from each other. Armsmaster, escort Shadow Stalker directly to me. And somebody, call Panacea for Hebert girl.
Already leaving the briefing room, Piggot muttered to self
“If only you could forgive us, girl.”

***
Amy Dallon / Panacea
 Despite being rather young, Panacea managed to see such things that even white-haired veterans talk with trembling voice. She saw an Endbringer in his prime, and survived after that. Only for that she could be called a veteran cape.
   Amy has been treating people for almost a year and a half, and during that time she had seen enough to consider herself to be a experienced doctor.
   But this time was different. Everything was different.
It was a completely normal Saturday that Amy wanted to spend with her sister before it went completely wrong.
  She was still in bed when overexcited Vicky crashed in her room. She forced Amy to dress up and escorted to  the rest of the family who were already in their full gear. Twenty minutes later, whole New Wave team was standing on the roof of one of the office buildings, from where a great view of the St. Brutus hospice opened.
   When they arrived the building was already cordoned off by Protectorate response teams, and the Wards in full force roamed around the perimeter.
   As Brandish said during the flight to the rendezvous point, the alarm was raised after the hospital staff abruptly stopped responding to outer world. Repeated calls to reception and numerous attempts to call at least someone did not succeed and people were anxied. Some concerned civilian rushed to see a relative and found only corpses in the reception hall. After that, he immediately called the police. Arriving at the scene cops called PRT

 As a result, the whole Wards team and most of the adult heroes are now gathered here.
   The vivid imagination of Panacea easily painted a picture of the event, which made her feel very uncomfortable. The young heroine firmly associated herself with hospitals.
  Waiting dragged on. The first half hour passed in the painfully tense waiting for reports from the heroes who were inside. There was even more fear in the loud, inhuman sounds which were caught by the microphones even outside the building.
    Then Velocity ​​and Assault managed to find the cause. Amy stayed away from the content of the negotiations, since she did not have direct access to Protectorate frequencies,only adult members were able to maintain that access permanently, but fo Vicky and her -  they were given access only in cases of joint operations.
    As it became clear from the sharp remarks of Brandish, the heroes of the Protectorate needed Amy’s help in order to somehow solve the problem with the parahuman who arranged all this situation. But her mother categorically refused to let her go inside until she had full guarantees of her, Panacea, security.
     Amy had to stay on the roof for almost two hours before guarantees were received and certified by a personal request from Director Piggot. Then Brandish gritting her teeth agreed.
   Panacea was walking along the empty corridors of the hospice, accompanied by an investigator from PRT and her insides were slowly freezing from the sticky feeling of the utter lifelessness filled this place.
 Silence.
Thick, oppressive eerie and impossible silence owned this place. Only rare voices of PRT members were heard in those now empty corridors.
Plants. It was the first thing that caught her eye.Numerous pots were now filled only with dust mixed with gray earth. It looked like every plant here have rotten into nothing. 
And bodies. Wrapped in black cellophane, they lay in straight rows in the main hall. Forty-eight bags. Forty eight people. Forty-eight new graves.
   And they want her to heal the one who did it?
She tried to pull herself together, to recall the Hippocratic Oath and that oath that she gave to herself. Panacea was not holy, she only followed the rules. But after all, every rule has an exception?
   Finally they reached the chamber. Nothing remarkable, except that she was in the wing for patients on life support. Approaching the ward, Panacea nodded slightly to the guardians which were Assault and Velocity, who also nodded grimly at her, letting the girl inside.
   ... And all the words and thoughts that swelled in the head of Panacea instantly disappeared, dissolving inside a much stronger feeling that flooded the mind. All her nature was filled by it in a single moment.
   Horror.
A creature soaring under the ceiling was the embodiment of something antagonistic to her. Unnatural. Something that by a mere existence denied the concept of life.
  Her power, the one that could easily tell her how many cells rot in a human body at that very second, seemed to stop before being hung up in the endless loop which consisted from two words:  “Not life”
   She froze as if she were rooted to the spot and would have stood in this stupor if the hand of Miss Militia, which was also inside the chamber, did not lay on her shoulder.
 - Believe me, we also had this kind of reaction with the Armsmaster. This Projection ... whatever it is - is a rather horrifying thing - an experienced heroine told her.
- B-but you? How are you not afraid? - Panacea asked in a trembling voice, looking at the serious and collected, but not giving and a hint of fear, woman.
Miss Militia raised head and met eyes with Panacea. Panacea trembled. Her eyes were completely lifeless. No fear, no joy, no emotion, nothing.
- Believe, Fear of death was the thing which I had to learn to live with.
   Panacea recoiled from the woman, then squeezed her hands into fists and shook her head decisively, chasing away the obsession. The fear has not gone away - just like nowhere has the creature that now soars under the ceiling has not disappeared, stretching out its inhumanly long hands towards the bed on which her patient apparently rested. With both hands, it touched the head of an unknown girl, barely touching her with the tips of his fingers dressed in white gloves.
   After taking three steps, Amy found herself by the bed of the patient and tooking a deep breath, touched her arm. Second - and knowledge filled her head. Knowledge that immediately astonished her.
   “She is still alive ...” the heroine gasped in shock, widened eyes looking at the medical miracle that now lay before her.
   - What do you mean? - Miss Militia came to her voice.
- Multiple infectious diseases in terminal stages, hepatitis of all three groups, not functioning lung, liver, which theoretically must already be dead, destructed kidneys, numerous blood clots, missing eyeball, damage to the spinal cord. This is only part of a very long list of reasons why she must be dead by now. And she's just in coma.
“Then why is she still alive?”
- It seems to me ... this is - with her free hand she showed at the projection floating in the air, - somehow it keeps her alive. Her heart beats, blood runs through the arteries, and the cells divide, while leaving the telomeres safe and sound. And in terms of biology - this is impossible.
“ Powers are bullshit “  Militia said thoughtfully, lookingat the projection soaring in the air, and continued after a few seconds, “can you help her?”
 Panacea thought for a while before asking:
- What happened to her?
Miss Militia hesitated for a moment before answering.
- This is confidential information, so I’ll get by with general information. It was a trigger. And very unflattering.
 Amy nodded.
- I think I understand. As for help ... my power is not working out of nothing, at least in its normal state. So if she were in standard conditions, even I would be powerless here. Too much damage, too many injuries. But while this, - the girl again showed at the projection, - keeps her alive, I think I can at least stabilize her, removing most of the deadly factors. It will take time, but I have to cope. But on complete recovery? No less than a month. And this is the best prediction that I can give by now.
- Clear. Get down to it - the Militia nodded, tossing the Ka-Bar created by her power into the air.
“It will take time,” Amy warned again, before she sat down in the chair next to the bed and began the treatment.
   She had to remove thirty-seven different fatal diagnosis, 
                                                                       ***
Sophia Hess/Shadow Stalker 

   The fact that something went wrong was understood by Stalker at the very moment when they were all alarmed at eight o'clock on Saturday morning and taken to St. Brutus. Not that this place was somehow noteworthy and interesting for her, yet it was located in the zone of responsibility of New Wave, and there were practically no criminals, and even more so members of gangs, therefore she was not interested in the hunting grounds.
  But like any decent predator, Hess had an animal instinct for danger. And this very instinct made her blood run cold, warning of danger. Sophia trusted her instincts.
   But she could not understand where and what danger could threaten her. Hess was a Hunter and knew how to cover her tracks. And in her humble glance, she did it skillfully. What was even more stranger she had a feeling that she knew from whom danger would emanate. But the thought, like a nimble rabbit all the time slipped from her head, as she tried to grab it by tail.
   Patrolling the grounds were extremely boring. Wards wandered around the perimeter of the building, strictly forbidden to go  inside, trying to prevent possible penetrations. The remaining heroes examined the building from the inside.
   Usually, the Wards served as some kind of entertainment for her. It seemed to her extremely funny to treat these lambs in wolfskins, provoking them to reactions and actions that amused Sofia to some degree. But today,  Wards were even duller than usual. Vista didn’t even try to respond to her caustic comments about how she compensated for her height with space manipulations, and Kid Win didn’t react to her words about the uselessness of his unknown specialization. Hess loved to play on the verge of a foul, but apparently the action taking place inside the building completely killed a spark of fun inside these kids.
Hess straightened crossbows on her belt. She still could not get used to the PRT-made crafts, which were so very different from her previous toys. However, they differed for the better, but Hess was not so stupid as to not understand the number of "surprises" intended primarily for herself, which were inside these tools.
   Three and a half hours spent on her feet made Hess forget about morning runnning exercise.. As if she was not infuriated by the need to be in the “club” in order to hide her heroic activities while studying in Winslow, Hess did not like to laze with workouts.
   Winslow. At that very moment, Sofia smirked under the mask. This school was one of the most successful decisions in her life. Place where she really could be what she deserved to be. Dangerous predator, the queen of the stone jungle.
   The school too valued the preferences that the city gave to institutions where current members of the Wards were schooled in order not to obey the rules that she established. No, no blackmailing or something like that. She just did whatever she wanted, staying within the limits of propriety ... for the most part, and the school ... pretended that everything was going as it ought to be. No more, no less.
   However, sometimes Sophia could not restrain herself and allowed herself a little more than usual. Like in the situation with Hebert girl.
  Oh yes, Hebert.
If an ideal predator existed in her personal world, represented by herself, then Hebert was an ideal victim. Meek, silent, emotional, weak. As if she was specially created so that others could take the upper hand over her.
   She had absolutely everything to turn Hebert's life into hell, thereby satisfying her thirst for playing with prey. She knew everything about poor Taylor, thanks to her faithful snake Emma. Hess really liked to watch  when Barnes strike Hebert into the most painful points with surgical precision, thrusting a poisoned dagger in her back.
   The beauty of betrayal. This is what Stalker admired in Emma. She could not stop being surprised by that endless malice and gloating that Emma could generate when it comes to Hebert.
   Madison was also in her “pride”... but she was only a secondary element,which if necessary, could be... replaceable. But yes, Clements was ... interesting. And if Barnes were a snake, beautiful in her treacherous deadliness, then Madison was a chameleon. Changing the color, merging with the environment, this girl was able to pick up and strike at the moment of maximum weakness, often falling at a critical point.
   Hess, Barns, Clements.
Ebert called them “Trio”. When she thought that no one hears her. One of the few statements in which Sophia agreed with this girl.
   They drove Hebert into a corner, in the sweet anticipation of the moment when she would fight back to break her completely. Like animals circling over a dying muskrat.
   And yet, when the muskrat began to fight back, they were not ready. However, everything went completely wrong from mere beginning
   Strictly speaking, it was Clements idea, once again surprising Sophia with Madison’s perverse ingenuity. Idea to shove Hebert into her own locker was quite old straght from the good 1950’s. But fill her locker with carefully collected biological waste and then lock Hebert in there... that was really something new.
   Something ... if Sophia could have described the idea with the taste, it would be something sweet, with a slight bitterness.
    But the plans remained plans. Reality ... reality turned out to be much more arousing. Making her blood boil fro mere memory of that day.
   For the best effect, they decided that it would be worthwhile to quiet down for a short while, to lie low, to hit Hebert at the moment when she would be completely relaxed. They all agreed with this plan.
   But the victim was too alluring.
Emma could not resist and decided to bite off a piece of wounded flesh that was Hebert's fortitude. She somewhere dug up old photos of Hebert's mother, where she was dressed in the colors of Lustrum's followers, when she was still at large.
   Strike turned out unexpectedly strong. Hebert had a natural hysteria and then she made an unforgivable mistake - the victim attacked the hunter. Barnes was never very sporty, and therefore she cannot seriously withstand Hebert’s attack. Nothing too serious, more catfight, than an actual fight, but bruises and abrasions, as well as the general spoiled look, touched Barnes hard enough to teach Hebert a lesson once and for all. Seeing those bright eyes that Barnes was looking at her, Sophia simply could not resist.
   Madison asked one of her many girl friends to fill Hebert's place with sticky, spoiled juice. When she went to the toilet, they began to act.
   The original plan was to stun Hebert, beat her couple of times, before throwing her into the closet for a couple of hours, but in the process of execution, idea captured them srtongly that they expected. At some time Emma spotted some household items which later were misused. Or maybe not. In the eyes of Sophia Hebert was not much better than garbage. Yes, Hebert girl was already unconscious when they got to the most delicious part, but ...
    Memories of Hebert’s lifeless and indifferent to reality look  will warm her soul for a long time. It was like an orgasm. Someone else's blood was once again on her hands, adrenaline from the realization that she was doing all of this under the nose of the PRT, a feeling of belonging. All this is in earnest agitated her blood.
   Later, when it turned out that Hebert had fallen into a coma, Hess belatedly felt fear that the PRT could launch an investigation, but quickly calmed down and began to act. Forcing Barnes' father to defend school in court was easier than before, and when Hebert Sr. sued Emma, ​​Stalker could not believe her luck at all. Everything worked out, Hebert disappeared, defeated and crushed, leaving real predators to feast on the bones.
    This pleasant stream of memories, which Stalker indulged in the last few tens of minutes, was interrupted by the voice of the Armsmaster in the earpiece.
-  All Wards - immediately return at the HQ. The cry of this creature may have something in common with that of Simurgh. We must be sure that it won’t affect you. On arriving follow the M/S protocol instructions 
 Sophia gasped displeasure. The protocols were pain in the ass. Now she had to spend half a day in a cramped room under supervision, proving to everyone that no cape or power has affected her. Truly hemorrhoids.
   The earpiece in the ear of the Stalker came to life once more, having pre-whined before that, showing that the transmission was only for her.
- Hess, on returning proceed straightly to me and then we go in a straight line to the Director Piggot.
 A chill swept over Stalker's back. The sense of danger has intensified many times.
“May I know the reason, sir?”
“This is related to  Miss Hebert case. She was you schoolmate.”
   The world around Hess froze.
She literally saw in reality how it would seem that separate events stand in one line, forming into the current situation.
   Hebert were in a coma.
St.Brutus is a hospice.
   Hebert could be here.
 Hebert was here.
 Hebert could trigger.
 Hebert  triggered
PRT identified her .Found a case. Raised archives. They found out about Barnes.
   Almost torn thread turned into a steel line that pulls the whole truth to the surface. And if it really comes up ...
  She can not return
She understood it clearly. Crystal clear. There was no plan, no strategy, just instinct. An instinct that even the most powerful of predators must sometimes follow.
   Run
***
An hour after Shadow Stalker escape
Consciousness returned to her as abruptly as it had disappeared. The pain that had so slowly killed her was asleep.
  When she opened her eyes, she faced a triangular, grinning skull, which seemed to opened in a silent scream.
     She should have been frightened.
     But there was no fear.
     Just ... recognition?
    Warmness.
    Recognition
     [Persona]
He took away his hands, before touching her temples and shook with his pale-white skull, making a strange sound like a gurgling. But for some reason she knew that he was glad that she was awake.
 - Miss Ebert, since you have come to your senses, could you remove your ... Projection?
***

“Miss Ebert, since you have come to your senses, could you remove your ... Projection?” - a voice from somewhere beyond her line of sight made Taylor twitch.
      She was agonizing in pain, and her limbs barely moved. It was almost impossible to her head. But almost immediately the headboard of her bed began to rise, giving her better viewing point. At the same time, she felt that the tubes in her throat were removed so she could speak again. Or maybe try to speak
      In addition to [Persona]  there were two more. First was a woman dressed in some kind of military uniform — high army boots, pants and jacket. American flag was wrapped around the waist, same pattern balaclava, covering the lower half of the woman's face.
      It took Taylor about half a second to identify Miss Militia, Brocton Bay Protectorate Member..
      Heroes? Here? In her room?
      But then... they knew her identity! They saw her! Were looking at her right now!
      Madison. Sofia. Emma. «Winslow.» Trigger.
      Everything inside Taylor seemed to freeze. Thoughts, emotions, air in her lung seemed frozen into the solid state
      She felt safe with him here.
      They wanted him gone?
      Make him leave?
      Leave her alone. No protection?
      Madison. Sofia. Emma. «Winslow.» Trigg...
      “No!“  she barely managed to croak, marveling at the weakness of her voice.
      She wanted her voice to be as loud as it was... the last time she saw the doctor. And he... whatever he was, he reacted, opening his terrible wings even wider and uttering a cry that sounded to her as a lullaby.
      She… wanted to feel protected.
      But the reaction to her words was immediate. Some kind of taser appeared in the hands of Miss Milita. Something similar to those things that Taylor saw in the stores on the Broadwalk when she still was trying to find some kind of protection from...
      Madison. Sofia. Emma. «Winslow.»
      They want…
     “Calm down... please”, — came from her right.
      Overcoming the infernal pain in her muscles, Taylor managed to turn her head enough to see the second visitor sitting in her blind spot. Her body was covered by a spacious white hoodie with red medical crosses and schematic symbols of paramedics. A red scarf was tied around her neck, covering the lower part of her face, the upper part was hidden by a deep hood. Sitting next to the couch, she was holding her hand
      Taylor felt as if some spring inside her relaxed for a moment, and the panic attack receded, leaving a nagging feeling of irrational fear…
      But looking at Miss Militia, looking at the weapons in her hands, Taylor realized that she needed to act.
      “I... h-okay. B-but why? He... he makes me feel good.”
      There was a gloomy silence, interrupted by a rare knock of coffins levitating in the air on the ceiling. Militia raised eyebrow, showing a mere degree of surprise at her words. And the gloomily observed:
      “For you - maybe, but the others are... a little uncomfortable. In addition, in order to continue treatment, we will need to move you to another hospital. And with your... projection, that would be... somewhat problematic”.
      That... seemed logical? Taylor heard Ms Milita words  and at the same time did not want to hear them. Some part of her, some important part, denied the idea of being without  [Persona] to protect her.
      Be calm, Daughter of Eve. Let Thanatos go. In a moment of danger... he will come again.
      Again her insides were frozen. But this time it was different. A voice in her head. Not the voice she didn't understand, not the voice that was woven from the howling of the icy winds and the wailing of thousands of souls.
      No. That voice... It was enchanting. Ideal. Every word she heard was like the most beautiful music you hear in the distance and try to remember, but the melody eludes you, leaving you wanting to hear it again. Symphonic utopia, Audio Catharsis - no word would be enough to merely attempt to describe wgat she was hearing inside her head right now.
      Flattery is not the worst of sins, but you have only confirmed the obvious, Daughter of Eve.
      "What... Who are you?!"— she tried to shout mentally — "And maybe I really am crazy".
      No more than the rest of the world, his child. No more. As for who I am — All in due time. Until then, let Thanatos leave your side, it is unnecessary to irritate those... Remnants more then they already are, 
      She... she felt truth in those words. Yes, heroes looked at her, expecting something. He... that Voice, he was telling the truth. But... Why she feel so scared? Why does she think she should let Tan... That's his name? Thanatos?
      She peered into the grinning skull of his. Somehow she knew - there were no face under that mask. Only Nonexictence gathered in material form.
      ...that if she let him go, this nightmare will begin anew...
      Madison. Sofia…
      Do not be Afraid, Daughter of Eve. If these... Remnants betray thou so soon, so Mote It Be. And I Will Come, The Star of Dawn.
      Something... those words were significant. Something... something. It was as if a mere piece of presence that very ancient had leaked through the keyhole.
      "I... H-okay" — she croaked the words before focusing on the... [Gate] mechanism. That was the best description she could give. Like... Like she's the gate. A gateway beyond real world and sowhere. Or someone. And now, concentrating, she could feel the remote control. She was so lame in describing that kind of things.
      With the last whistle, Thanatos disappeared in a motes of blue light, as if shattered, and Taylor felt as if some part of her had returned to its place. And simultaneously with this event her headache, that was tearing her skull from within, virtually disappeared, leaving only fatigue.
      Together with the disappearance of [Persona] heroes visibly relaxed. Weapon in miss Milita hands immedeately disappeared.
      But it was only thing that Taylor saw before she felt  that her eyelids poured lead, and the mind started to float away, plunging her into the Kingdom of Morpheus.
      The last thing she heard was miss Militia's voice.:
      "Panacea, what are you..." — but she was asleep before she heard the ending.
      Sleep well, child. My presence is enough to make some debts pay themselves… 
***

      Miss Militia.
      Watching the cause of mass deaths and the main headache of the day immediately fall asleep after Recalling her projection, Hannah was displeased.
       "Why did you put her down?" she looked at Panacea sitting next to Hebert.
      "Did you see how scared she was when asked to remove her projection?"  Dallon girl asked.
      Miss Militia nodded.
      "She's probably under the influence of her own projection powers, whatever they are, but what's the point?"
      Panacea turned her head, releasing the patient's hand.
      "I don't know how to treat, fix and read minds, but the emotional state is another story. Emotions to me is like a slightly sodden newspaper. I could be wrong in the letters, but the essence will always be correct" There was a bit of pride in her voice. "So, after a request to withdraw her projection she panicked. I don't know who or what she was afraid of, but I had to synthesize a massive dose of sedative right into her bloodstream to calm her down and not order... whatever it was to attack. That's why I decided to put her to sleep, in her waking state she's... unsafe, in my opinion."
      Hannah nodded, agreeing with the reasonable conclusions and fears of the Panacea. In her opinion it would be good to at least try to fish some information from Hebert about this whole incident, but the actions of Dallon girl fully fit within the PRT protocols.
      — Alright. Thank you for your help, Panacea. You may leave. I think in the next few days, PRT will send Brandish a request for your presence in Hebert's treatment.
      When Panacea said goodbye and went out, Hannah touched his ear, activating the radio.
      — Militia to PRT. Projection perished, Mortician is stabilized by the Panacea and ready for transportation.
      A moment later, the radio came alive with an answer
      — PRT to Militia. Understood, transport on your way. 
      
***

      Protectorate tower. Director's office.
      Emily already managed three times regret her words about the day, which cannot become even worse. 
First time — when she learned about the source of extinction in the "St. Brutus".
Second time — when she learned the circumstances of what exactly was Taylor Hebert trigger event. 
And the third time — when she learned that the member of the Wards was somehow responsible for it.
      And now she regretted her words for the fourth time.
      — So, Armsmaster. Am I correct in thinking that after you announced the M-S protocol — you told Hess that I wanted her to come to you, and then you gave her the reason for the meeting, along with the disclosure of information about Cape's civilian identity?
      Armored man didn't move. Thanks to the visor, Piggot could not discern his facial expression. However, this was not needed. She knew her subordinate very well.
       "Ma'am, I'm not…"
      But Piggott interrupted him.
      "Shut up. Colin, it's not my first year at PRT, and yours also. That's my fault I didn't say that Hess could be the cause of Hebert's trigger. But did I have to say that when the entire protectorate Department was on the line? You couldn't put those two facts together? Damn it, Colin, couldn't you wait till the base?
      Armored man once again was silent. However, she was one to blame. Piggot could not but admit that despite the fact that the Armsmaster remained one of the best Tinkers in the service of the Protectorate — sometimes he sorely lacked common sense.
      Taking a deep breath, Piggot continued.:
"And what do we have now? Hebert is a tickling PR bomb. The rhing is that we cannot simply assign KO or put her in a Birdcage without trial. Youth Guard and media will eat us alive. She's not a Canary, still a minor, but with a trigger like that... And now a runaway Hess. How do we explain that one of our Wards going AWOL? What happens if she goes rogue? — Piggott went on to say, already for the most part not paying attention to her standing in front of the Armsmaster, who was more like a piece of furniture. Leaning on it per day required output.
      But in a moment the words ran out, and Emily was finally able to collect the brains in the bunch. Looking at Wallis, Emily, mentally damned that man in front of her. But damage control must be made
      "So. You've made a mess, you're the one who has to deal with it. You go to the Barnes' and do the search. All warrants will be in half an hour. I need ALL the evidence you can find. Next. Stalker, of course, will try lay low, but I doubt that she is so professional to hide everywhere. Analyze where and to whom she could go, you have data on her. I want every CCTV, every drone looking fo her.Find  Shadow Stalker, Colin. We need to get her before anyone gets wind of what's going on here. I'm already accountable to Director Costa Brown for everything that happened today. You understand me?"
      — Yes, ma'am, — the Armsmaster said sullenly.
      — You may be free, — said Piggot.
      As soon as he left the office, the Director picked up the phone and, finding the right number, pressed the call button. There was so much things that needed to be resolved.


Gunsmith/Colin Wallis.
      You can't be good at everything. You always have to sacrifice efficiency. This simple truth Colin had learned a long time ago. For someone this rule was less fair, for someone — more. And in his case, that rule treated him with all its effective cruelty.
      The armorer was well aware that he was a good Technician. One of the hero's few disciples, a member of the first guard, one of the key members of the Protectorate... People could say a lot about him as a Cape, but almost no one could say anything about him as a person. And Colin couldn't blame them.
      He was well aware of how narrow his social interactions were, and how weak he was in what people called "empathy." He tried to compensate for these shortcomings through the use of their abilities — so there was his visor with built-in lie detector and analyzer of social ties. But even so, he was far from being a normal person. And he was quite willing to sacrifice the effectiveness of his "I" for the sake of his heroic role. But not always this efficiency came to his hand, and he could not but admit it. So it happened now.
      His software for predicting social behavior again showed its imperfection, not allowing him to draw the necessary conclusions. The Director did not mention what was written in Ebert's diary, and Colin had drawn the wrong conclusions. It was simple. An error in the calculations leading to a decrease in efficiency to critical levels.
      And now he needs as quickly as possible to neutralize the cause of these disturbances, while the whole system is not rolled downhill, completely losing all efficiency.
      An outsider, if he knew in any form what categories the protectorate hero thought, would be shocked, but for the Technician himself it was just a simple mental trick that allowed him to interact with reality and society at an acceptable level — he only perceived reality as tinkertech.
      Suddenly, a light chime sounded from the speakers of his helmet, signaling the request for an incoming connection. Displaying the helmet's caller ID, the Gunsmith immediately accepted the call.
      — Dragon, I was given direct access to communication systems? Why don't you use this?
      — My father always taught me to knock before I came in. Just good manners. Hi, Colin.
       Hello... Dragon, is a canadian Nerd, a mysterious girl with agoraphobia, was probably the only person in the understanding of Colin approached the meaning of the word "friend."
      Their communication was... productive. The dragon is very much helped Colin in his technarte, they also work together to develop some projects that could help not only "Guild" and the protectorate, but generally around the world. Therefore, in her presence, if you could call "presence" audiovisual two-way communication channels, he allowed himself to be a little more... ineffective, if they were not busy with any work. That, however, happened rarely.
      — I... I heard what happened. I feel so sorry for these people... Colin, it's not your fault. Piggot admitted it herself.
      Colin shook his head.
      — I was wrong.
      — We're all wrong, Colin. All of us. But we have to learn from our mistakes?
      There was a brief silence as the Armorer headed toward his workshop. Before he went inside, he sighed to answer his partner... and friend.
       It's effective. Will you help me find the Ghost Stalker?
       Sure, Colin. Getting access to security cameras all over the city. If she catches a glimpse of at least one — I know.
       Thanks, Dragon.

***



      Pierce Polkiss was a very ordinary man. How ordinary a person can be a simple shopkeeper on the territory of "Empire 88". He praised the gods for the fact that the Kaiser and his henchmen did not dig up his story further than his parents, and therefore he could easily be a carrier of the fourth part of the Jewish blood, while keeping his small but quite profitable business in one of the gang territories. Of course, part of the income he had to give up "Empire", but it was the lesser evil of two possible.
      On its territory the gang tried to maintain order and legality, Polkiss even witnessed a few skirmishes stray bandits and night patrols "Empire". Ended which is not in favor of the guest performers. This, however, did not stop petty crime like stealing, however, the destruction of such was tantamount to completely get rid of cockroaches is to get rid of you can, but sooner or later they will come back.
      But in this moment time he was would glad, if would the Imperials worked out with street punks, which, proud of its "communication with "Empire", that in common people meant "potential cannon fodder", has behaved absolutely is unseemly.
      Rules, of course, they knew nothing, except threats and theft, never did, but it was still vybeshivaet Polkiss to the core.
      Today these nerds cornered again. A group of shaven-headed young men with tattoos of varying degrees of nationalism fell into his shop with the appearance of kings inspecting the plebs. And all would be nothing if these gentlemen insolent, straight from under his nose would not have pulled almost a box of beer.
      There was nothing he could do. The police reacted very inertly to calls from "gangster" areas, plus to all any special proofs Mr. Polkiss couldn't provide because the small shop wasn't equipped with security cameras.
      Now, as he scrolled through the events of the day in his head and dangled the tape of the electronics store, Mr. Polkiss Felt a sudden surge of determination. In the end, the police and the "Empire" will not be able to respond if he will be able to provide the theft?
      With these thoughts, Mr. Polkiss Pressed the "add to cart" button, and the brand new security camera with good color correction and a night filter began its journey from the warehouse to its new owner…

      
***



      Thomas Calvert/Quirk.
      Reading the report, the official communication channels of the UPC, Twist, compared with the same report, but provided they are purchased within the same organization. Not to say that the information was very different, but the conclusions could be very, very interesting.
      The trigger of the new parahelman was not so out of the ordinary, especially here in Brockton Bay, where the population of the capes in proportion to the total number of inhabitants surpassed many other cities in America. But the trigger, the victim of which becomes at once such a number of civilians — it was something extraordinary. Even Nilbog, for all his monstrous ability, during the trigger event did not give anything like that. And the Twist was to some extent grateful to anyone for the fact that the projection of the Undertaker stopped at only one hospital. Calvert Had enough unpleasant memories of the Ghost towns to make him not want to repeat the situation in a place that he rightfully considered the object of his interests.
      And to be in the "Cage" of the new Cape, if not for the circumstances of the trigger, which potentially outweighed the danger posed by the Cape, due to extremely sensitive for the UPC moments like "guard", which was potentially if not involved, at least knew about the potential trigger and did not report it, which was at least suspicious. And if the information from his agents is correct, the guards will soon be one less.
      At the moment, the Quirk was trying to assess the potential benefits of certain moves. With one hand he could try to recruit Phantom Stalker in "Neformaly", however he doubted in expediency such a course. Stalker and "Informals" have previously encountered on the battlefield, and these meetings were memorable for both sides.
      On the other hand, you could take the Stalker into the category of... more specific assets. With her psychological portrait and worldview a kind of "predator" from the Stalker could get a very good and, most importantly, do not ask questions of the killer, with the correct treatment, of course.
      On the third hand, both recruitment options were very unprofitable for the simple reason that the Stalker was known as Cape raz, UPC had her civilian identity — two. And if Hess had fallen into the hands of UPC — all his efforts would have been nullified at the same time.
      There was a second option, quite logically derived from the first. Recruit The Undertaker. New, obviously powerful Cape, with a high rating of the Master and the same high-level projection would be a great addition to "Informal", given some similarities to family circumstances, other members of the team. But even without his abilities he's seen quite a number of obstacles. Starting with the fact that UPC again knew the identity of the Undertaker, and ending with the fact that the physical condition of the girl was far from any norm, and if in the situation with Noel, her physical condition was in his hands, in the case of the Undertaker, the picture was the opposite.
      Of course, there was a fourth option — to do nothing, letting the whole situation take its course. But the potential for lost profits, which he saw in all that was happening, made him stubbornly deny his own idle impulses.
      But before you begin to act, it needs to ensure that the effort invested will not go in vain. To calculate all the outcomes he can not, but to make two elections the most right — on, that he knew how.
      Comfortably seated in his chair, Calvert set both directions for the development of realities and prepared to observe the outcomes.
      
Divide.
      Oh! No. W%: S)B0Kia
It was something new. The quirk knew the limitations of his power, which did not work, being aimed at the Destroyers and some... personalities, of which he would prefer not to think more necessary. But all these characters dropped out for his definition of "normal capes", with which his power did not give failures. Until this moment.
      The quirk decided he might have imagined it, so he tried again.
      
Divide.
      Oh! No. W%: S)B0Kia


      After the second time the head of the children of Calvert little sick, I said to him that triggered his powers occurs, but the force itself doesn't work. To consolidate the result, he decided to try again for the third time, this time setting out to separate the routes to his apartment.
      
Divide.
      Oh! No. W%: S)B0Kia


      Thus the fact was cemented. The power of the Twist, his power, suddenly stopped working. And something, or more likely, someone blocked that power completely. And to say that Thomas Calvert Liked that outcome was a blatant lie.
      Now he'll have to deal with that too. And if he understood the cause of the... outrage correctly, he might have to take advantage of the past... of some members of his personal supervillain team to effectively and quietly eliminate the threat.
      But first he needs to make some important calls

***



      Location unknown.
      An emergency meeting was called. At a small table in a spacious room with dim lighting there are several people. Without masks, as everyone here knew the others too well.
      If there were an outside observer here now, he would be amazed at the personalities of some of the people here, too well known even to the common man in the street. However, the appearance of an outsider here was definitely impossible.
      And that was the reason. But nobody knew about them. As no one knew about this place.
      — What happened?  one of the women at the table asked.
      There was hardly a man who could call this woman unattractive. But the look in her eyes, cold and tired, could just as easily scare away ordinary people as her appearance easily attracted them.
      — I would also be interested, why such urgency?  the second woman, also at the table, asked.
      An ordinary woman, who could not be less than forty and not more than fifty. But, despite the usual clothes with a medical gown thrown over her shoulders and a complete lack of communication with some entities, this woman had every right to be at this table.
      — Path has changed. This was the simple answer of the third woman sitting at the table. But these words stirred everyone else. They didn't expect to hear something like this.
      — What exactly happened? Where?
      — Variable. There was a factor of chance. Unlikely. It has changed the Way.
      — Where was this variable?
      — Unknown. Path stopped seeing her a few hours ago.
      There was a tense silence. The news brought by the woman in the suit was overwhelming. For the first time in many years of the existence of an organization, a random unforeseen factor intervened in the main line, changing it.
       Then what are we waiting for? We need to find this "variable" and understand what it is and how to work with it, — said the man in the green suit enthusiastically.
      — Not the time was short, but the quick response of the woman in the suit. — The path does not see the variable now, but until then the first step was unambiguous.
      — And what was it?"  a woman in a medical gown asked.
      — Wait.


***
Ragnarokkr 1.04

Emma Barnes, February 13, 2011.
      Emma had always been proud of her intuition. Pulling feeling somewhere just below the back of the head more than once rescued her in difficult situations. For example, when she forgot to copy homework borrowed from Hebert, just before Mr.Gladly decided to suddenly check their homeworks. Something similar happened when Ebert tried to record their... entertainment on tape. Then she managed to hold Sophia and Madison back before they could ruin the whole game.
      Yes. «Game.» That was the closest definition of all the things Emma could think of to describe what was happening at Winslow.
      Game. Simple and effective. Emma had learned the rules the summer before high school, when the scumbags from the ABB surrounded her in an inconspicuous alley not far from home. Then, looking in their eyes, barely , Emma suddenly realized all the simple sense of this crazy complex world.
      There are no humans or animals. There is no division between the reasonable and the unreasonable. There are always predators and prey. Those who feast — and those on whose bones feast. And she sure as hell didn't want to be eaten. She saw it then, and, apparently, a reward for the discovery of that truth she was given a chance at rebirth. And she took the chance, willingly taking Sophia's outstretched hand.
      But in order to be reborn finally, the need for sacrifice. The bridge linking it with the past that needed to burn in order to cross this Rubicon. And she had such a bridge. Taylor Ebert was Emma's road. Her first and oldest friend. And all the more valuable victim of she was.
      Emma was scared at first. She wondered if it was worth it. She didn't know how strong the bond of friendship between her and Ebert was. She didn't like pain. She was afraid of pain. But she wasn't. Bullying Taylor did not bring her pain. Just... satisfaction. Looking at her tears, Emma realized that she was not a victim. That she's stronger and more dangerous.
      And this feeling excited her. Gave strength and energy, filled her life with contrast, in a word, made her who she was the last year and a half.
      That was until last month. That was before the accident. She was aware that they had... overdone it. Before that, he and Sophia and Madison had never crossed the line between their... victim and the Berserker state that the victims fell into when they were cornered. Emma had always felt close to that border, perhaps because she had been there herself. But that time she was wrong... And the mistake cost them their lives.
      Ebert snapped. The mother's theme was too deep a wound for Taylor. Deeper than Emma thought. Because the pain from my split lip and several bruises became too much for her abrupt change of the usual tone of life.
      Everything that happened after... was veiled for her. No, she, if desired, could remember every second and every detail of what happened, but the overall picture, the thrill of all that had happened... All of it put together like puzzle pieces, soaked after rain, didn't want to get in the grooves.
      In itself it came in a week. If you could call it that. At one point she just realized herself standing near the locker Ebert and staring through it as if in anticipation of what Taylor's about to come out of a turn and allow Emma to continue so prolonged the game.
      But she didn't come back. Not in a week. Not even in two. And then she began to worry. Something inside her, some fragile plate that held her whole complacent state, slowly began to crack.
      Her day, once full of bright colors and new images, energy spilling over the edge, suddenly became gray and dim. The world around her, singing and chirping, seemed to shrink to the size of a huge dim tunnel with light at the other end, which looms unattainable point. It was as if someone had removed the battery from her life that fed her existence.
      And in this string of gray days that followed each other endlessly to Emma, drop by drop, came an understanding of what or who was to blame.
      From her father she knew what had happened to the Eberts. After all, her brand-new smartphone and the outfit she had chosen meticulously for so long were part of it all. But she didn't go into details, satisfied with the basic facts.
      But in the changed circumstances had changed and her desires. She wanted to know everything. She wanted to see what had become of Ebert, to see with her own eyes what was left of her. And she intended to do it.
      But it was.
      The reality was completely different. Since yesterday morning, her intuition had been telling her that the danger was near, but Emma could not understand what was wrong.
      Until I thought of turning on the TV.
      The wide-angle screen showed the reporter standing in front of the building, surrounded by yellow tape. Adding sound, Barnes froze.
      ..."It is unknown what caused the tragedy, however, the representatives of the Control Service of Parapros tend to the version about the new Cape. As you can see, the scene is cordoned off and patrolled by the "guards", however, as we learned, search operations inside the building are still ongoing. At the moment, it is known about forty-eight victims, both among the staff and among the patients of the hospital. The fate of at least four others remains unknown. We will continue to conduct a live report from the scene and talk about new facts…»
      The television continued to speak, but Emma could no longer distinguish the words. All her consciousness at that moment concentrated on a single word.
      Ebert.
      Ebert was there, she knew it. Dad mentioned about the difficulties with the guardianship and medical bills, which has led to the fact that she was in "Brutus". And now this. Something was wrong. She didn't know what, but she was sure Taylor had something to do with it.
      The sucking feeling of growing anxiety, coupled with the already half-melancholy mood, resulted in a series of vivid nightmares in which Ebert rose from the dead, destroying everything dear to Emma in front of her eyes. Barnes lost count of how many times that night she woke up in a cold sweat with the feeling that everything that was happening was real.
      And the more monstrous it became when ten minutes ago her brand new smartphone rang, identifying an unfamiliar phone book number. She hesitated for a few seconds before replying.
      — The UPC does. They found out who was responsible for the story with Ebert — the voice coming from the speakers could not belong to anyone but Hess.
      — SKP? What Pro... — almost shouted Emma, but Sophia has interrupted its:
      — No time. Get rid of everything. Don't leave anything. If they ask — you know nothing! You understand me? — the voice of Sophia sounded like never threatening.
      — Y-Yes. But how are you…
      — I'll find you if I have to, — the call ended abruptly, leaving Emma in utter confusion.
      But the girl was able to overcome it. She was well aware of the danger of the situation, and Sophia's imperative... was absolute to her. The kind rarely told with it in such a tone. And if she did, Emma would listen.
      After receiving instructions, Barnes gave herself a mental kick to accelerate and rushed upstairs to her room, where there was everything that could indicate her involvement in the story with Ebert.
      For a start she found the old phone to the memory card which stored pictures and videos of some of their antics. Emma found it fun to revisit some selected moments while enjoying her own participation in this show. Also from under the bed was extracted diary with some notes that Barnes did not forget some important points related to Ebert. After all, everything new is well forgotten old. Both of these items had to be destroyed, but Barnes couldn't think of a quick way to do it. So she turned on the computer and, briskly rattling off the password on the keyboard from the system, climbed to open the e-mail, containing them with Sophia and Madison personal correspondence, as the simplest to destroy the evidence.
      Selecting all the most incriminating letters from the list, Emma reached for the delete button with her cursor, but the sound of the door opening made her instinctively freeze and turn toward the entrance.
      There were two men in the doorway. Her father, now looking extremely and extremely preoccupied with something, and the man in the uniform of an officer of UPC, of about thirty in appearance, with thick, but short beard.
      — I'm afraid you'll have to stop, miss, whatever you're doing." We have a warrant to search your room, — three other UPC operatives said as they entered the room. — And you, along with your father, you need to come with us for questioning....
      At that very moment, something inside Emma collapsed.

      
***



      What is space?
      A multidimensional coordinate system with given laws, mechanics, and interactions?
      Unlimited area of contact of certain infinities, forming a finite set of axioms that determine reality?
      The moment of reality of energy-time, frozen on the eternal line of the terminator of the past and the future?
      None of which. And all at the same time. The paradox of the observer, the theory of critical mass.
      Being has never defined consciousness. Only consciousness determines being. For her, time and space were now like two magnitudes frozen at different poles of a magnet.
      There were no coordinates, no usual metrics of four dimensions. It was everything and at the same time — the point of singularity, seeking to disappear into nothing.
      Time for it as if froze, went back, flew forward, rolled sideways and moved jumps at the same time, without influencing the events in any way.
      She was here.
      But what is "here"? Where is "here"? When "here"?
       And He said, let there be a firmament between the waters, and let it divide the waters from the waters. [And so it was.] 
Voice. A voice that came out of nowhere and was always there. A voice full of power and hidden power. A voice that seemed to proclaim the truth with every sound, imprinting it into being, recording it into reality.
      — And it was said: Henceforth you will lift up My Voice, giving weight to the Word with a sword.
      It wasn't just a line. Words proclaiming the truth of the past, announcing the present and affirming the future.
      She was confused. Voices. More and more. She heard them, felt them. They were an endless cacophony, so loud that she could hear only silence. Illogical, wrong, different — they were all here.
      Here.
      She couldn't answer what "here" meant, what it meant.
      — The signatory [of the Contract] is outside his Jurisdiction. his will. His Anger. His Mercy. His Trial. The Gates Of It. His Guardian. The Key To It. The Crate Is His.
      She didn't. I couldn't understand. Wanted to understand. But the knowledge was too multidimensional and voluminous, did not want to shrink to simple measurements.
      — AZ His Voice, AZ The Voice Of Knowledge Will Render Communion.
      Something touched her. And knowledge filled her. Without words and images. Only knowledge. If she could describe what she knew — she would only say that it was obvious. As if it were said that the straight is straight and the sun is shining.
      Obvious knowledge.
      But it was too overwhelming. The world around her. This place, "here," it shuddered. Infinity, which became a segment, and the beam, curled into a ring. The metric has changed, turned into another form, collapserow, rejecting her.
      — Go, the Spawn of Him, the whole World Phenomenon of Your Wishes. Call out his Judgment and his Voice to the People you desire.
      A moment — and a sense of presence disappears, leaving its in blissful oblivion. Sleep of the mind is an effective remedy.

R 1.05


***


      The consciousness returned surprisingly. At one point in her mind, it was as if the light was turned on. After a long sensory deprivation, the five senses instantly returned overfilled her brain in pitiful milliseconds.
      She was frightened to open her eyes, blinded for a second by the dimmed artificial light that illuminated her ward. Anyway, this place looked like a hospital ward.
      The ceiling was as white and unfamiliar as it was there.
      There... There!
      Memories... She couldn't say how long it had been since she woke up for the last time, so what happened filled her head with anxious pictures.
      Heroes... Heroes from the Protectorate were in her room when she woke up. But why? Why did they come to her?
      She remembered the figure, the figure that was floating over her. The figure that seemed... familiar to her despite it's unnaturalness. She remembered the voice in her head. A figure, a voice... Did she became a cape?
      But then... Then...
      Emma. Sofia. Trigger. Father.
      Horror filled her. Completely irrational and at the same time so real. The walls of the room seemed to be shrinking over her, threatening to crush her with its mass.
      Cape.
      She was a cape. And heroes knew about it. For some reason, that was what scared her the most. She... She remembered that once she wanted to be a hero. She dreamed of flying in the sky like Alexandria, or of being as strong and versatile as Eidolon, tinkering like Armsmaster, but now... Now she was afraid. Heroes... Heroes, they can be like... Emma.
      "No! They are heroes! Protectorate was created in order to help people to fight the villains!" - She tried to build some kind of protection against this fear by fencing it off with a wall of belief. And she was willing to swear on anything that when she said it, it was like someone's charming and light laughing laugh came to the very edge of her mind in the summer wind.
      The body... body obeyed her. She suddenly realized it, freeing herself from panic. She carefully tried to tense her muscles - and they responded with pain - but she felt her hand move upwards. After repeating the operation with her legs, Taylor was quite convinced that, despite the fact that she was still as good as walking to the moon to an "acceptable" state, but she felt much, much better than the last time. Besides... The eye. She felt her eye. It was still covered with a bandage, but she felt it. But then... Was she cured? Panacea healed her?
      Why? Because she was a cape?
      She didn't know the answer. And she didn't really want to know. But she kept thinking about it over and over again. Taylor had the feeling that if she stopped for a second, she'd interrupted the chain of thought as something would happen to her. Something would happen. Something bad.
      But Taylor's plans were interrupted by the hissing of the opening door. Actually, the sound of hissing attracted Hebert's attention. With some effort, turning her head towards the entrance, she noticed that there was no actual door but a steel plate. Now opening door revealed a silhouette in white garment coming in. Her still unfocused vision prevented her from concentrating on the entrance, but the red spots on the hoodie allowed her to speculate about the guest entering the room. 
      Panacea.
      Heroine. Member of the New Wave. One of the most famous capes on the planet, best Cape Medic in existence. Brockton Bay Wonder. Honorary citizen and many other titles. Description straight from ParaWiki, in which Taylor could hang for hours, studying all available information about the capes.
      And now this girl was in front of her. A heroine, a celebrity, the hope of the entire globe, she embodied everything that Taylor was deprived of. Confession, family, friends, being in the company of other people...
      Madison.
      Taylor felt a wave of seizures running through her body.
      Madison. Madison. Madison.
      It was as if she'd seen Panacea dropping her hood under Clements' face. It... was so real that... that she almost believed it.
      "No! Bullshit, nonsense! Panacea is not Emma! She is a hero!" The voice of her mind was trying to calm the rebellious heart and emotions that were now dominating her. But this voice was too quiet for this boiling mixture of fear and painful memories, and therefore remained unheard.
      Meanwhile, the Cape Medic, noticing that the patient came to her senses, carefully, without making any sudden movements, approached Taylor from the side of her sighted eye and leaned over to get a better look at Ebert.
      Taylor, on the other hand, was on the line between unconsciousness and catatonic horror, which seemed to paralyze every cell of her mortal body. White color and red crosses... Symbols of peace and help - they did not seem to her like such. For her, they were signs of danger. Danger and fear. That's how she perceived it, that's how she felt, even though the voice of her mind told her that it is stupid to be afraid of it.
 "Miss Ebert, can you hear me?"- finally asked Panacea to finish her superficial analysis.
      She couldn't achieve much without direct contact with the patient's skin, but her personal moral code didn't allow her to heal strangers without permission. However, Mr. Chambers said something like that when she first met him and discussed her heroic career. In any case, she was observant enough to notice most obvious things about her patients. Mortician... or whatever her cape alias were was once again in some kind of pre-exposure state, so Panacea was somewhat unsure that she fully understood her condition.
      "Y-yes..." Taylor squeezed out, spending a lot more energy than she might have thought. There was an incredible dryness in her throat and a state of panic, which she managed to crush for a moment with a titanic effort of will, so that it would triple back in the next moment.
      Panacea let herself have a weak, invisible smile under her scarf. Everything was a little easier for her. She couldn't, she didn't want to work with her brain, and that's why she was all the more nervous about her not being aware of her patient's reality.
      - Can I heal you? - She reached out and prepared to touch Ebert's hand. Of course, she had already had two sessions with her, the first at St. Brutus, and the second on arrival at Central Brockton, but both times the situation required her intervention in order to save her life. Now ... it was a matter of formality.
      Healing.
      Healing
      Healing.
      It was as if these words had crashed into her skull, burnt on the bones of her skull box. Panacea offered her healing. Health, a normal life. Opportunities. But...
      "I..."
      ...but inside her, it's like someone pulled a emergency break. It was as if she'd stumbled upon an invisible wall that she couldn't get around. The words she wanted to say, the consent she was supposed to give, all of it... wiped, stopped by a force that Taylor had never felt before.
      It was... She couldn't describe that feeling. It wasn't a barrier or a border. But... It was like... It was like... It was like... The association inside it was falling apart at an empty end.
      "No... I'm sorry..." whispered to Taylor, feeling tears coming out of her eyes and shaking with fear.
      Panacea's hand stopped a few millimetres away from her skin.
      "What?" Panacea asked, hadn't fully grasped the meaning of what Taylor had just said.
      "N-no... Don't touch me... Please..." the girl wheezed, snapping at the whispering.
      "But what about... treatment?" Panacea tried to change her patients opinion.
      "I... I can handle it. Please, don't touch me!"
      Panacea looked at Hebert again. And I was amazed. In the girl's eyes she saw pure and clear horror and despair. And that fear was directed at her. More precisely, not her, but what she could have done. That she could have touched her, helped her. She had seen a lot of things, but that was the first time she had ever seen anything like it.
      "Alright. I won't do anything"  Panacea's voice was traitorous, but she managed to cope with herself. She slowly, so that Ebert could follow the movements of her hands, took them away from her and took a few steps back.  
"I will warn the doctors to prepare a course of treatment... " Panacea did not have time to finish the sentence before she was interrupted by Hebert.
      "No!" that's all Taylor was able to squeeze out of herself, afraid to meet... people.
      Panacea... She was afraid of her. She could confess to herself. But she could control her fear. Not for long, but enough to create at least some appearance... of a normal conversation. But as soon as she heard about the fact that she would have to meet a lot of people, she was protested inside. Something she didn't want to touch and disturb. Something painful.
      "But then you won't get well..." Panacea decided to try to bring common sense to discussion.
      To be cured.
      To be healed.
      Healing.
      She needs to be healed.
      And the sea stirred up...
      
Child, thou wish for Healing?


      A voice. She heard a voice again. But this time the voice she heard was different. It belonged to a woman. This Voice... It was as if he was enveloping her mind with warmth, just by his sounding like a mother's hug that closed on her mind. They closed to open up when the voice stopped sounding.
      Taylor wanted to scream. This brief moment, these words - they seemed to give her something back for a second... long forgotten and lost. Something she wanted to feel again.
      But the voice of her mind made her think of the words she had said in the Voice.
      She didn't know if she was crazy or if she saw it. But the voice was quite obvious. She also felt... Presence.
     It was as if someone behind the door had gently knocked on it, indicating a desire to enter.
      Not a desire - an opportunity, an offer?
      She wished for Healing. She wanted to get rid of the pain, make it disappear, evaporate, returning at least a part of it to her, the part that had not been lost on... that day.
      Yes. She wished for Healing.
      And that's why she [opened] the door. And at that very moment, her lips were whispering almost silently:
       [Persona]
      And the room was flooded with bright light.
      
Daughter Firstborn of Geb Am I. Mother of the Sun, Ruler of Heaven.


      Panacea, blinded by a flash of light, shuddered by the first sounds of this voice. But she was not the only one who felt the power coming from these words. Even the operators behind the security cameras installed in the room were blinded. The golden light became a little less bright and began to form a figure in the middle of the room.
      
My tears were the Nile spills.


      It was still impossible to distinguish between the shapes and features of the face, but there was someone in the middle of the room. It was two meters tall.
      Panacea found the strength to hold down the panic button, causing a rapid reaction squad in the next room.
      
The Bird Of Hath Am I.


      The detachment did not keep itself waiting. No sooner had Persona's words been heard than the room door opened again, giving precious seconds before a squad of operatives with foam sprayers and stanners had to break into the room.
      
So Know My Name...


      The door opened completely, but Taylor, who was in a state between shock and stupor, looked at the way soldiers were supposed to rush in without any involvement of her mind, froze as if they were enchanted, looking at the woman standing in the middle of the room. Loose white clothes with intricate patterns on the edging fell to the floor, framing a majestic figure, as if made of lively marble - her skin was so perfectly smooth. Behind her was a majestically spread pair of falconry wings, and on her anthracite black hair was a headdress in the form of bull's horns, between which was squeezed sun disk, radiating real sunlight.
      
Isis.


      The lights went out, but all the people present stayed in their places as if they were fascinated. Only Isis looked at Taylor with a half smile on her lips, who was also looking at the... Goddess.
      Otherwise, she couldn't name the one that was standing in front of her. Perfect. That was the only description Taylor could have picked up for her, and that was only the faintest of shadows that could cast away the beauty of this celestial woman.
      The goddess moved away, paying no attention to the people around her, except Taylor herself. She even moved majestically, as if by every step she was asserting her right to bear her titles.
     "You called me, poor child. And I responded. You were looking for healing, child..."
      When Isis approached Taylor's bed, she leaned down gracefully and whispering something kissed the girl on her forehead.
      At the very moment when the lips of the goddess touched her, Taylor felt like a wave of energy was rolling over her body, instantly flushing away pain and fatigue, filling her muscles with energy and strength. 

Pain... just disappeared.
 
      But the most important thing is that together with the kiss, everything... all those fears that were in her head now, devoured her from within - all of them instantly gone, leaving her mind crystal clear. She knew it wasn't forever, that they would come back, but she didn't want to think about it now.
      She was just feeling goo...
      At that very moment, her head was shot in pain. Unpleasant, pulsating. And this time, she knew what and who was the reason.
      Taylor looked at Isis. She smiled gently at her before she leaned up and turned away, looking at the paralyzed PRT operatives.
      
There is no need to expose the blades, Defenders of Maat . Neither I nor this child wanted to hurt you.


      After that, she turned again to Taylor and Panacea, who were still standing by the bed, afraid to move.
      
I have to go. I am afraid that the Child is still not strong enough to call me in my full power. But before that...


      Isis has shone again. But this time her light was not blinding or bright. It was as if she was caressing, giving strength and noting fatigue, making old scars overgrown and everyones heart beating with new strength.
      And it wasn't just Taylor who felt that way. Panacea, the PRT team, the entire west wing of Brockton Bay Central Hospital, and even a few random passers-by, they all felt the power of this light.
      That was the power of the healing given by Isis.
      And the next moment, the mother goddess smiled before vanishing. Without sound and additional effects. Just disappear. But Taylor felt that someone had gone through the [Gate] and returned... Whatever it was. But before that, Taylor had heard a quiet but very serious phrase:
      
Beware the First of Fallen. His deeds always lead to his benefits
   And so she disappeared, leaving her, Taylor Hebert, alone with confused PRT strike squad and stunned Panacea. So it seemed to her, at least for a second, before the headache, avalanche-like amplified in pitiful moments, carried her mind in the arms of Morpheus.
      Again.

      
***



      Looking at his hand, where a minute ago there was a scar from the teeth of the neighbor's dog, Lieutenant Jenkins sadly said the phrase he hated right now, but was oblighted to say.
      - We need to report to the Center...
      The disjointed humming of the voices was his answer.
      They were all waiting for a fascinating epic with three days of quarantine under the M/S protocols

***

R1.06

 Emily Piggott.
      Director Piggot was well aware that her attitude towards parahumans was too biased as a result of Ellisburg. But, on the other hand, cases like these once again proved that her fears were not unfounded.
      However, knowing that she was right in no way diminished her headache or her understanding of the PR-collapse that the PRT could expect in the near future if she didn't figure out how to deal with what had happened.
      Now she was sitting at the head of the round table, which, apart from her, included the entire roster of PRT capes, as well as all the specialists involved.
      Piggot sipped off the water from the glass and carefully placed it on the table, as if doubting her movements. After that she started slowly:
      - So, let's get this straight. After everything that happened at St. Brutus, did we move the Mortician directly to Brockton Bay Central Hospital?
      - Yes, ma'am.
      Piggot rubbed her temple. She remembered very well that she had given the order herself, but did anyone here have the balls to tell her it was a bad idea?
      - Okay. Then tell me for the love of God who came up with such a brilliant idea to put her in a ward in the main building? Not in the bunker under the hospital, not in a secure building specifically for the capes, but in a simple room, albeit with increased protection?
      This time, Miss Militia took the floor:
      - The undertaker is a minor, ma'am. "The Youth Guard will eat us to death if she knew that we had put the underage cape in a room prepared for someone like Kryukovolka or Lung after the trigger. In addition, the room in which the undertaker was placed was supposed to hold her back. We do not know exactly how her powers work, so we applied standard measures to keep the Sovereigns with projections. The operatives were equipped with darts with powerful sedatives, there was also an automatic turret in the room in case her abilities were stronger than we thought...
      - Then why didn't any of this work out? Why did the girl manage to call the projection? - asked the director with the expression of extreme dissatisfaction on her face.
      - We don't know exactly why the automatics didn't work, but according to the reports of the operatives, they experienced something similar to the aura that Slava radiates. They just couldn't get themselves to raise a weapon against it.
      - Glitter. We missed the very fact that the undertaker's trigger was missing, so now there are multiple projections. What do we have on them, by the way?
      From a place the Armourer has risen, pair of pressings of sensors displaying on the general screen of the image of projections of the undertaker.
      - At present we know about two projections. The first one is the code name "The undertaker", which we assume is the reason for the incident in "St. Brutus". Height - two and seven tenths of a meter, a disproportionate thin body with long arms. Dressed in some kind of military uniform, the original origin of which could not be established. Behind his back are eight independent structures in the form of coffins of unknown metal with bas-reliefs similar to those depicted on the coffins of medieval knights. We estimate it as the Driver-three because of its ability to fly...
      - I propose to raise it up to at least five, judging by how much he spent in this condition - the flight time is not limited, - said Miss Militia, thereby breaking into the monologue of the gunsmith. Piggot nodded, agreeing with the reasonable judgment of the subordinate. The gunsmith made amendments, after which he continued:
      - And also Epicenter-six, at least. We do not know the mechanics and nature of the impact, but we assume that the projection was always near the conscript and influenced remotely. And also the Lord Two for their ability to create a feeling of unnaturalness in some radius from themselves.
      - I would also add the ratings of Contacts, Strelka and Bugaya. At least three of them each. Contact for the fact that the projection somehow kept Ebert alive for at least a few hours. The arrow for... the screams that the projection makes from time to time. I don't know how strong and effective they are, but they clearly enhance the feeling we give the Lord's Grave Digger. Rough - just in case. We haven't had any combat contact with the projection, that's true, but this guy didn't look like someone who cares much about bullets," Miss Militia suggested based on her own interaction with the undertaker.
      - Accepted," nodded Piggot. Paranoia and reinsurance were the things thanks to which SKP has been surviving for a dozen years already. She would even say that the ratings were understated, but even in paranoia it was worth knowing the measure. - What about the second projection?
      - It's getting more and more interesting here. The projection appeared at about fourteen twenty-seven today, after Ms. Ebert refused the treatment offered by Panacea.
      - How can you be afraid of a cute little girl like Panacea, I don't understand... 
  - How can you be afraid of a pretty girl like Panacea, I don't understand... - commented Sturm.
      - Perhaps Miss Ebert's emotional injuries are much deeper than we thought from the beginning..." Yamada thoughtfully concluded by writing down something in her notebook.
      The gunsmith, meanwhile, continued:
      - Then, for twenty-seven seconds, the cameras in the room were blinded by a flash of light from the projection. After that, the projection materialized completely, at which point the Gunsmith unfurled the image of Isis on the big screen. - She then said a few words, then approached Miss Ebert and healed her in bodily contact. Then, before she disappeared, she used some kind of influence, apparently mass healing," the Gunsmith finished his quick report.
      - Did you manage to record the projection voice?
      - Yes, we were able to record this," the gunsmith pressed a few more keys and the projection voice was heard from the speakers in the hall:
      - Daughter First I am Geba. Mother of the Sun and Heaven. My tears are the floods of the Nile. I am the bird of the Hath, the vedicle of the world. And my name is Isis.
      Even a voice recorded on a microphone that wasn't the best, made everyone in the room feel a herd of goosebumps running down the skin. Emily felt that something inside her had gone down, making her gut get cold.
      - What happened to this recording, Gunsmith?
      - It's unknown, ma'am. The dragon scanned the recording without finding any foreign elements or the presence of an infra- or ultrasound. Regardless of the number of iterations of editing and copying this soundtrack - it still remains the same...
      - Devil... What, do we even have tape recordings that can get the Lord's rating now? - The Battery has run out of steam.
      - It seems so..." said the Storm next to her.
      - So. We will deal with this later, - Piggot stopped unnecessary speculation. - Did I get it right that we were likely to be dealing with a reasonable projection?
      The gunsmith nodded:
      - Yes. Projection, "Isis", as she called herself, showed reasonableness unusual to the projections of the Sovereigns. Linked speech, independent behavior, communication skills, small submotorics, unusual for unreasonable projections.
      - Couldn't it have been Ebert? - decided to clarify Miss Militia.
      - Excluded. The facial recognition system shows that Ebert was as surprised as we were.
      - That is, it is a reasonable projection, acting independently of Cape Vlastelin. It's brilliant," Speed concluded grimly.
      - What's the classification? - Piggot asked, internally trying to come up with the mildest and most streamlined language for the report to the Director of the Costa Braun.
      - Lord, the rating is no less than Slava's. The contact-six may have healed Ebert's wounds completely, bringing her back to the state she seemed to be in before the events at Winslow. The epicenter-six may have healed people within a 60-meter radius. Probably the engine, at the expense of the wings.
      The silence was established, broken only by the rustle of the air-conditioning system. The staff of the SKP considered the situation.
      - I understood correctly that we are dealing practically with the second Panacea, only this Panacea still knows how to heal en masse? - was asked a question by the shocked Storm.
      - That's right," nodded Gunsmith. - But according to Panacea, Isis is not a biokinetic.
      - In what sense? - This time, Miss Militia was already surprised.
      - Panacea examined patients after Isis' treatment. After Isisa's treatment, she said, the telomeres* of the patients have not changed, as well as the amount of fatty tissue or any other possible building materials in the body.
      - Are you saying that it cured people by actually creating a mass out of nothing?
      - According to Panacea, that's exactly what happened. And that's not all," Gunsmith added.
      - Speak up," Piggot said.
      - There is no limit to the effect of Manton on her treatment," Gunsmith dropped the information bomb.
      - What do you mean, no? - He asked for Speed in a dizzy, almost whispering voice. Manton's capes without restriction were rare, and most of them were either members of the Protectorate and allied heroic organizations, or had a murder warrant. The second was not necessary to anyone.
      - Manton's restriction suggests that the power of the capes in most cases works only for certain objects. Panacea can treat the body, but cannot work with the brain. But the analysis of the Dragon and the testimony of Panacea suggest a complex effect on the organism in a large radius with almost the same effectiveness as when touched. Look at this, - The gunsmith pressed several sensors and the image from the cameras increased, showing a small pot of wilted geranium standing on the window sill. Then the gunsmith pressed the rewind button, and everyone present could watch the dead plant blossom in a few seconds. - As you can see, the power of projection is not ogre
. - As you can see, the power of projection is not limited to people, but is rather directed at all living things.
      - It's... Man, I've always known that power is a lot of lottery, but what the hell... - Speed has passed.
      - We'd have one such projection in the battle with the Rioter and things would go much more fun," added Storm.
      - I'm afraid you're all missing one important detail," Miss Militia said thoughtfully and with a little pressure. Waiting until she continued to pay attention to her: - I watched the whole tape, and before the projection started its treatment, no matter how it worked, I heard it:
      - I have to go. I'm afraid the Child is still not strong enough to call me in my full power. But before that...
      Isis's voice again gave everyone the creeps the creeps out of it, this time twice. For the first time, from the sound of the voice itself, and for the second time, from the awareness of her words.
      The battery cursed dirty, but no one even thought to shake it. In her thoughts, everyone was in complete agreement with her definition of the situation as a whole. Even Piggot.
      The director at the moment felt that her recent headache seemed insignificant compared to what she was experiencing right now. Although it may have been because of the realization of how deep the JCC's ass could be if even one corrupt journalistic soul knew at least part of what was going on.
      - So, let's take stock. Our potential public relations ticking bomb by the name of Taylor Ebert is capable of multiple projection calls, at least one of which has self-consciousness and healing abilities at least one of which is at least an order of magnitude greater than Panacea's, and has already demonstrated these abilities to the common man. We are dealing with a cape that ignores the Manton effect and God knows what else we can do, we only know that they can become stronger. And with all this splendor, we have a Ghost Stalker who has escaped and who may try to do something about Ebert. Did I get this right? - Looking at the uncertain nods of those present, Emily continued: - And now let's imagine that I will tell the director of Costa Braun, who has expressed a personal interest in the St. Brutus incident. How soon do you think everyone present here will be out of work with a black mark on their personal files?
      Looking at the pale and ingrained faces of her subordinates (even the capes shuddered markedly), Emily relaxed a little bit. When your head hurts not only for you, but also for your subordinates, it gives you some sense of satisfaction.
      - As I understand it, none of us need such problems. That's why you gentlemen have... - Emily looked at the clock, - twenty-eight hours to solve the problem with Ghost Stalker. Do what you want, but do not let any journalist get a feel for it. Do you understand? - Waiting for a restrained nod from the Gunsmith, who had already been busy with the problem, Piggot nodded back to him before contacting a staff psychologist of the SKP.
      - Yamada, you're wearing Ebert. I don't know how, but you have to make sure that Ebert is ready to at least cooperate with the Protectorate. The last thing we need in the world is our Panacea among the villains. Especially when the same cape has someone like the undertaker. In general, you have a full carte blanche. In ten hours Glenn Chambers will arrive here, he should help you and all of us to get out of everything that we all got into.
      - I will, ma'am," nodded Jessica, "something stirring hard in the notebook.
      - Then that's it for today, everyone's free. But gentlemen, I hope you all realize how thin the ice over the sea is from the shit we're standing on right now.
      Silence was her best answer.
      Having risen hard, Emily moved towards her office. It was almost midnight on the clock, but she had a job waiting for her. A lot of work.

R2.01
 Panacea
      Amy was dead tired. For her today was too exhausting, too vivid for events and nervous.
       She would lie if she say said that she was not expecting any trouble today. Monday morning didn't work out from very beginning. Her weekend were troublesome enough with this whole Morti…Pantheon event. Her dreams for peaceful sleep were shattered with nightmares after her meeting with Pantheon’s Projection. This... creature whatever it was, represented very antipode of Panacea's power, and its appearance... penetrated her soul much more than Amy could have imagined.
      Not to mention meeting Isis. Amy wasn't ignorant, so it wasn't hard for her to remember that name. Mother Goddess of the Egyptian pantheon. She was the patroness of women and master over life. That she was.
      Panacea still refused to believe in how Pantheon projections denied ordinary reality, all that she was used to. Instant tissue regeneration without reducing telomeres length and the use of free body mass. Panacea could have been a healer, but Isis could really cure.
      So then, chewing a little undercooked toast and almost biting her nose in the plate, Amy could not get rid of the idea that right now there was someone extraordinary in Brockton Central.
      Amy... didn't like Mondays.To all intents and purposes, she could not remember a single person who would love them. Especially if your weekend was not really a weekend, and you’re having Science test at nine.
      Despite having superpowers, Endbringers, and all the bacchanalia of madness, which was her world, Amy still remained a simple student, with typical school problems. However, the thought of an unexpected patient did not go away, even during the test, which, however, she managed to write on an honest "B".
      As soon as she, Victoria and Dean sat down at the table, she heard the phone ringing. A special phone. Moreover, it was not just her phone call, but also that of Dean, Victoria and the other Wards, who had attended school and were now scattered around the dining room. A few seconds later,  general school evacuation siren sounded.
      There was no time for hunger. It was rare for PRT to summon entire Wards squad. And now they were summoning all of them and New Wave. Amy had a very bad feeling about this.
      What happened in the next half hour, Panacea could not describe except by the word "pure chaos". Instructions as such were practically absent, all they’ve been told that the Pantheon had escaped from hospital, badly wounding dozens of PRT agents. This would not have been a reason for such panic, if not for public display of Pantheon’s Projections.
      When they arrived at the scene, Amy was shocked. Because the sight of a huge, fifteen-meter tall albino tiger, shrouded in real lightning, was something definitely new. 
      Director sanctioned fire. Miss Milita were using sniper rifle trying to tranquilize Pantheon. But the real damage they could not cause because of something like a shield of lightning, which literally disintegrated any shells in the air. The SKPs were afraid to attack because of the size of the projection and the proximity of the hospital, which was still in the process of being evacuated.
      Panacea watched with anxiety how gradually all the masks of the Protectorate City Department and their allies were pulled down to the scene.
      However, the massacre was not destined to happen. At one point, near the projection tiger appeared already seen earlier Isis, who at the same time entered into a dialogue with the Pantheon.
      They were too far away to hear anything, but the effect was immediate. The winged projection shone, and an ephemeral bundle of light separated from her sunshine headpiece, which had risen into the air and exploded in gold rain. Amy even seemed to have heard a dirty joke from Stoick about it, but she wasn't sure. One drop touched her body, and Amy felt her fatigue dissolve without a trace, giving her vigour. It was... an amazing feeling. At the same time, she realized that it was just a micron crumb of what it could do.
      At the same time, the lightning bolts running across the huge body of the projection in the form of a tiger broke out, creating a blinding flash that managed to break even through the autoblackening filters.
      When the flash went out, the projection, along with the Pantheon, disappeared from the battlefield, leaving behind destruction and the prints of huge paws on the asphalt. But Isis didn't disappear, hanging in the air above the battlefield.
      And then... Then she spoke. What happened after that, Panacea didn't remember well, mainly because she spent the next five hours in endless throws through the hospital, examining every patient Isis had touched, and then talking to doctors from the Protectorate.
      She was led by Victoria's hand, which Amy suddenly found on her shoulder, detaching herself from another patient, confirming his complete recovery. She did not understand why this was necessary. But apparently, the CPS required maximum confidence that Isis' healing was not a joke or some kind of biotech time bomb.
      - Hey, Ems, how are you? You seem tied up," Victoria said carefully, looking at her sister's face.
      - Mm-hmm. All I want to do now is get home and drown in a hot bath," she whispered to her sister as she walked out of the room.
      - Me, too... How much more do you have?
      - These are the last of them, I think. Anyway, I have already gone around all the rooms that I was asked to check. If nobody said anything, we're kind of done... - she lost half her word, stuck on the corner of the medical cart, and almost fell, but at the last minute she was picked up by a strong hand of Victoria.
      - So. That's it, you've had enough. They were driving her away. You're going to lose consciousness now! You can do as you like, but I'll call my mother and we'll fly home from here!
      - But the patients..." Amy sluggishly tried to object, internally agreeing with her sister's actions.
      - It would be worse if the only and unique Panacea fell unconscious and opened her nose! You can't heal your wounds! - Victoria put her hands in her sides, hanging over Panacea. The only thing left to do was to be ashamed of her silence - her sister was in her right. Then Victoria took the phone out of her suit pocket and dialed the number. It took half a minute before someone answered at the other end of the wire.
      - Hello, Mom, hi. Look, Amy's not here anymore, can we go home now? - The girl was quick to stab her in the pipe. That was all she was, energetic, bright, powerful... Fame.
      Amy looked at her involuntarily. Even Vicki, tired after all this Bacchanalia, looked better than Amy ever could, it seemed, just radiating a positive radiance and inspiring confidence in her powers. Maybe it was the effect of her aura, maybe just her innate charisma, Panacea did not know. She... just loved watching her. As long as possible. As close as possible. But it is contraindicated to think about some things. And she knew it. Meanwhile, Slava was answered.
      - Yeah, thanks, mom. Okay, let's warm it up. We will, let's lie down. Yeah, bye-bye," Victoria, smiling, turned to her sister after the call.
      - Mom says that's enough for today. Are you ready to take a ride with the breeze?
      - Yeah," Panacea nodded, hiding her flaming cheeks in a hood.
      Her sister looked at her with excitement.
      - Hey, hey, are you all right? You're all red! Maybe a bite...
      - No, it was just a little stuffy in the penultimate room. And stress... I'm okay, honestly," Amy said, hoping it would calm down the "dent mode," which her sister used to have from time to time.
      - Mm-hmm. I see how it's "okay. Your face is not the first freshness of a zombie. Well, I'll get this Pantheon... I'll twist the horn into a mutton horn!
      Panacea jumped up.
      - Vicky, don't! Don't even think about dating her! And especially to fight! Haven't you read the letter from Director Costa Braun?
      From this pressure Slava stepped away a couple of steps aside. Looking at her sister's excited face, she rubbed her forehead and raised her hands in a gesture of conciliation.
      - Hey, take it easy, sister. I'm not going to climb the rojon, but if I could get her..." Glory hit her fist on the palm of her hand.
      - Vicky..." Panacea started quietly.
      - What is it, Ems? - Her sister didn't often speak in such a crowded and pleading voice.
      - Promise me.
      - Promise you what? - Slava did not understand.
      - Promise me you will be careful if you meet her. What... what you saw today isn't everything. I know... There's more. There are more of these projections. I saw at least one more... The one that killed people there at Brutus. And..." with every word, her voice became more and more shaky. Yes, she was a doctor and saw the worst wounds. But she hadn't had time to burn out yet, no. She still felt, felt and felt for the patients. And she still had fresh memories of that Projection, of how she was literally shouting her strength in response to her antipode. But she wasn't destined to burst into tears. Strong but gentle women's hands hugged her, encircling her in a ring.
      - Don't cry... I don't know why that thing hurt you like that, but I'm not stupid, Ems. This Pantheon, whatever happens to her, is extremely dangerous. Mom says she's potentially even more dangerous than Lung and the Empire combined. If we meet... I'll be careful. I promise.
      - Okay..." Amy exhaled, hiding in the chest of fame. So they stood still for half a minute before the tension subsided, and both of them, who had already lowered their steam a little bit, headed towards the exit from the hospital.

      
***

      It was cold. Hospital clothes were clearly not designed for any long stay in premises without heating, not to mention the February streets. The first breeze of the dank winter wind made Taylor realize this with all its might.
      She wasn't too picky, setting up the Bai-Hu coordinates to move, which is why she found herself, along with Persona, right on one of the streets of the long deserted part of the Docks.
      Away from the conflict, the Defender took his usual form, allowing him to move around the neighborhood without much trouble and without fear of being noticed because of the huge size of the Person.
      By breaking the barn lock on one of the doors, she managed to get inside the most decent warehouse. Inside, there was a darkness interrupted by the rare rays of light that fell from a few windows, illuminating small areas of space. It was foolish to hope for electricity in this part of the city, at least.
      But even the loneliness and roof over one's head, which was so desirable, did not solve all the problems. More precisely... they didn't solve anything. And now she clearly understood that. Yes, she was healthy. Physically. But she didn't even have banal clothes, let alone money. Hell, even underwear wasn't there! And the worst part was that Taylor couldn't remember the last time she ate seriously. Everything was a little bit difficult with hospital food, as they fed it three times and something like liquid porridge, which practically didn't give it any nutritional value.
      Getting money and food in this part of town was a very difficult task. However, as in any other part of the city. Taylor doubted that anyone in their right mind would want to sell something or lend clothes to a barefoot girl in a hospital gown alone for a naked body. To meet with the police or the SKP... Taylor had no desire.
      Closer to the warm skin of Bai-hoo, she tried to warm herself up and think about what had happened soberly.... As far as possible in her case.
      Sophia...
      Emma. Madison. Soph...
      "Not now"! - She shouted at herself with a huge effort of will to keep the memories of that day away from her.
      Sophia Hess was a Ghost Stalker. This explained everything. Behaviour. Impunity. Frequent "training". For Winslow, Stalker was not just a child, but a golden child with whom the Protectorate subsidized the Guardians' schools.
      It was painful. It really hurts to find out how those you consider heroes broke your life. And the more pleasant it was to see a broken figure of Hess, pulled into a suit, taking away on his motorcycle Gunsmith.
      She didn't hear from Yamada, but she heard enough. Madison is under arrest, Emma is under house arrest, and Stalker is with SKP. That... was reassuring. As far as possible. Perhaps they will finally get what they deserve. It won't bring anything back and it won't solve anything, but Taylor was quite happy that they were going to find out for themselves what hell was. So, anyway, she represented the colonies for minors. Maybe if she was lucky, Hess would go to the Cage at all. The most suitable place for someone like her, if you believe the rumors and the few official information.
      But at this rate, Taylor is unlikely to live to see next week. If she can still find water, it's not so hard to find it in the city, it's much harder with food, let alone clothes. Perhaps you could have stopped by Kurt and Lacey's house, but... The thought of meeting someone connected to her... now that she's in the past, people are getting goosebumps in Taylor's skin. Definitely not now.
      She wanted to sob. She got out of one cage and got into another, bigger one. And she saw no way out.
      Few people find a way out, some do not see it, even if they find it, and many do not even look for it.
      Taylor was getting scared of how quickly she got used to the voices in her head. Perhaps because somewhere on a subconscious level, she realized that they simply could not hurt her. Therefore, when she heard a new voice, she only slightly twitched, more surprised than frightened.
      The new voice sounded... young. Like a girl of about her age. But there was something in that voice. As if a cute little baby voice could snap into the ruthless cry of a banshee
      - What are you talking about? - she turned to her.
      Oh, right! The best way to explain is to do it yourself!
      At the very moment when these words were spoken, Taylor felt the movement of tissue all over her body.
      As she looked at it, she found that her body was now dressed in other clothes in addition to her hospital gown. An ancient cut of grayish blue dress with a white apron, which was tied on the back with a big white bow. On her shoulders she found a wide and warm fur coat with a collar of some animal's wool.
      - Are these... clothes? - Taylor was surprised to ask.
      Everything that is said three times becomes true
Clothes. Clothes. Clothes!
      Her voice sounded fun. Directly. And it was... refreshing. It wasn't... Tanatos, she didn't get it, it wasn't Lucifer, it wasn't Isis, who seemed too... adult. No, she... she sounded close.
      The words were spoken by themselves:
      [Person]
      She just showed up. It was as if she had come out from behind an invisible door that separated them from each other. She was wearing an almost identical blue dress with an apron. Only her dress seemed more intense than Taylor's.
      But... that wasn't surprising. Taylor seemed for a second to look at herself as if she were looking at herself, reflected in a crooked mirror. They were too similar. Same height, same body proportions, same facial features. They differed only in the color of eyes and hair. The hair of the brightest gold fell on her shoulders. Together with her eyes that were so piercing blue that they seemed to glow in the dark, it made her so innocent and beautiful that Taylor unwittingly wondered if she herself might seem the same.
      Her reflected copy smiled. Her smile did shine in the darkness.
      - Never consider yourself different from what others think you are, and then others won't consider you different from what you want them to think you are.
      Something in Taylor's head clicked, putting your thoughts in their places.
      Lying on the floor, Bai-Hu snorted before looking at Taylor with his yellow eye. Feeling the dumb question, Taylor smiled at him and nodded.
      - Thank you, Defender. You can go now.
      The tiger's last snarl was a glow of blue sparks. Taylor turned to Persona.
      - Welcome to Wonderland, Alice... Liddell," she said as she stood up from the floor. Taylor loved Carroll's fairy tale as a child, and Annette never missed an opportunity to talk to her daughter about her favorite subject. That's why she knew the real name of the prototype character girl. But is the character?
      - Ah, nobody called me that for a long time... - Alice just answered, continuing to smile warmly.
      - Perhaps I should thank you for your clothes?
      - Complete, Contractor. It's just the smallest facet of what you want us to bring to the world by your command. It is not worth the gratitude.
      - Thank you anyway. I'm... not in the best condition, to be honest - it was pretty strange - to talk about a psychological state with a creature that just a minute ago was just a voice in your head.
      - Oh, how familiar I am with these words... But don't be afraid. We will not harm the Contractor. And now... do you want some tea? - With this magician's gesture, she took out a porcelain kettle from behind her sinus.
      As if in answer to this question Taylor's stomach rumbled almost comically.
      - I... wouldn't give up anything denser," she said, embarrassed, turning her head away. God, she was ashamed in front of her own Personas. But she was becoming more and more hungry.
      Alice's eyes were rounded off before they flared up even brighter. She put her hand to her mouth, almost caricaturically depicting the shock. Although Taylor doubted to some extent that it was on purpose. More like gesticulating was part of her... legend?
      - Oh, poor Contractor. Of course you're hungry! Oh, how could Alice forget about such a simple thing as she could... - Alice, as if started to repeat the words about her own forgetfulness, pretty nervous Taylor with a sudden surge of emotion.
      - Everything is fine," Taylor tried to calm down this session of verbal self-abuse.
      Alice interrupted half-word to look at Taylor again.
      - The contractor wasn't offended? Oh, Alice is happy about it, so happy. And now... A meal! Dinner! Dinner! - she clapped her hands three times, and the third cotton in the dusty darkness of an abandoned warehouse out of nowhere appeared table.
      Taylor wanted to wipe his eyes. She knew that her abilities were working... in a very strange way, but she had never heard of anything like that before. No, she had an idea that Aidolone was capable of something like that, but that she would?
      The table that came out of nowhere was breaking down from something half the names of which Taylor didn't even know. There was a Peking duck, something like fondue, Viennese schnitzel, and a couple of dozen other dishes that looked as delicious as possible. And all the magnificence that was now opening up to Taylor was smelling so tempting that it seemed to her like she was going to be out of her stomach for another second to fill herself with these truly luxurious delicacies.
      - It's a little too much for the two of us..." Taylor said with uncertainty, slowly moving towards the table. There were several bright chandeliers in the middle of the many dishes that gave us enough light to make it easy to see the entire table. At one end of the table there were two carved wooden chairs with high backs on both sides, next to which were clean plates with a set of cutlery.

    - Ah, I'm afraid there's no need to worry about me, Contractor. I am only here by your will, and this food is only for you! - showed Alice on the table, smiling.
      - But then why the second set of appliances?
      - The lady doesn't need to be alone. I will keep you company! - Alice walked around the table in a circle and sat down on her seat, and then gently moved herself to the table. So did Taylor.
      - T- so much..." Taylor said, not knowing what to choose.
      - You shouldn't give preference to one thing when you can try everything at once," Alice said enthusiastically, putting pieces of delicious meat, seasoned with some subtle smelling of spices, into your plate with quick movements.
      Taylor followed that advice to the full, putting a little bit of everything on her plate. She did not focus on what she ate, focusing entirely on the process of filling her stomach.
      All of this... all of this, all of this seemed to her to be such a surreal, unrealistic and unimaginable illogical plot of some postmodernist story without morals. But at the same time, with every piece of food rolling down her throat, she increasingly accepted what was happening as an objective reality.
      But still, she was scared of the speed with which her reality was changing. If someone had told her a month ago that she would have had such a simple lunch with a real book Alice, she would have at least turned her finger at her temple.... However, everything has changed. And, frankly, she had no idea what to do next. But... she could postpone planning her future steps to a later time.
      After quenching her hunger and eating more for pleasure than necessary, Taylor leaned back in her chair and looked at Alice. The person had already dealt with the portion she thought was necessary for herself, and was slowly drinking tea from a kettle that seemed to come out of nowhere. She felt Taylor's gaze and smiled warmly again.
      Taylor sighed and looked at the glass of delicious apple juice in her hand.
      - Say... I know it's a bit of a stupid question, but still..." she shut up for a second, going with spirit. - Are you... are you real?
      The person thought about it. For the first time in their brief fellowship, Taylor didn't hear an instant response to her words.
      Half a minute later, Alice gently put a half empty cup on a saucer before she started:
      - Depends on what you think is real, Contractor. I am here by your will. Pierce me with a knife and I'll bleed. Kill me and I will return to the Sea of Souls to be called by you again. Because I can't answer either yes or no, Contractor.
      Taylor has her head wrapped around her.
      - No, no. That's not what I meant. Are you real? Stories, legends, myths, books, all this... Is it true?
      Alice just laughed at it.
      - Ah, Contractor. Certainly not. And, of course, she did," she sipped tea, looking directly at Taylor.
      - I don't understand - Taylor really didn't understand, because Alice contradicted herself.
      The person smirked.
      - Ah, dear Lady Contractor. Think about what the light would have been like if we had walked through it. Angels and Demons, Gods and Monsters. Fight Michael and his army with a ten-horned dragon in the name of the Wife in the Sun. Borozdi is actually Leviathan's gloomy oceans. That's why the stories of the gods and monsters are so good that the tale of them remains a tale. However... I think you understand the idea.
      Taylor understood. She lived at a time when people had new Heroes and new Monsters. She was the victim of the system herself. But Alice continued:
      - But, meanwhile, we exist. Beyond reality and the objective, we are. Each of us, be it a Hero or a Monster, an Angel or a Demon, a Saint or a Heretic. We remember our lives and our deaths, as long as they have been. For us, our history is a reality. That is the essence.
      - That is... For you it really was? A story made up by people... created you? - Taylor was a little insecure about it.
      Alice nodded.
      - Yes. Human faith breathed life into us and gave us strength. But that was just the beginning. Created by human faith, we continued to exist outside of our own stories and inside them at the same time. It's hard to explain, but we've long been more than just living stories.
      - You [Personas] ... Aspects of the twenty-one [Arcana] Tarot, called by the power of the signed [Contract] ... these words have arisen in her head by themselves, unknown knowledge.
      - Everything is so, Lady," Alice nodded, drinking again from the cup.
      - Alice... How do you differ from them? - Taylor suddenly came up with a question. In fact, Alice was really different from the rest of the Persona that she had been calling up until now. Open, friendly, willing to help. Not that the other Personas didn't do it... Was Alice... simpler? Taylor couldn't give an unambiguous answer, so she decided to ask.
      - What are you talking about, Lady? - Alice looked almost surprised.
      - You... are different from the people I had called before. I don't know. I can't tell you why you're different. Tanatos... He saved my life. Isis healed, Lucifer showed me the truth, Bai-hoo helped me escape, but... You're acting differently for some reason. It was as if you didn't want to help because I was a Contractor. I know it sounds stupid, but...
      - You're right, Contractor," interrupted Taylor Person, "I want to help not because you're Contractor, but because of you. I remember... the city. Like this one. On islands far from here. They brought me back to life, gave me toys... and left me alone. In the whole city. Only my toys, puppets, which quickly get tired of playing with... And that's why we are something alike, Contractor. Something incredibly small and infinitely large, but similar. So... let me tell you one more thing.
      - Of course, - the voice of traitorous confusion, so serious and wise looked the girl in front of her, which was difficult to give more years than it was Taylor, if not to know that it was Person.
      - The Sea of Souls is not one, Contractor. Heroes and villains, gods and monsters... The same combinations. The stories that brought them together had long been mixed up and collided. And from that there will be no end to their strife. Your words will obey the Legion and bow the head of the Archangel. But each of them will see his own way. They do not want any harm, no. But the ideas that lead them lead to different outcomes. And only you have to choose where you go," Person said, clutching an empty cup.
      Taylor was silent. Millions of thoughts were buried in her head, unable to connect in a single chain. Everything was simple and logical, but at the same time it didn't fit in her head. Finally, she asked:
      - Who were you with, Alice Liddell?
      The person smiled.
      - Ah, Contractor, never liked it "eat" and "drink". The exit is always somewhere in the middle. There are those who put someone else's interest above their own. But the fullness of serious conversations, Contractor. Would you like some tea?
      In her hand appeared full of teapot.
      - I wish you - I gratefully accepted Taylor's drink. Inside her for a second, the inner springs trembled and loosened, which had been so tense the last few days. Perhaps she had finally found an ally.
